BROADBAND  PROVIDERS 
AND  CONSUMER  PRIVACY 

S.  HRG.  110–791 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  25,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

48–450 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2009 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 25, 2008  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Wicker  ..................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Attwood,  Dorothy,  Senior  Vice  President,  Public  Policy  and  Chief  Privacy 
Officer, AT&T Inc.  ................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sohn, Gigi B., President, Public Knowledge  ..........................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Stern,  Peter,  Executive  Vice  President,  Chief  Strategy  Officer,  Time  Warner 
.....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Tauke, Thomas J., Executive Vice President, Verizon  .........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Cable 

Page 
1 
1 
2 
26 
29 
3 
31 

4 
5 
15 
16 

8 
10 
11 
13 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........

37 

APPENDIX 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

BROADBAND  PROVIDERS 
AND  CONSUMER  PRIVACY 

THURSDAY,  SEPTEMBER  25,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:06  a.m.,  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan, 
presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. The hearing will come to order. 
This  is  a  hearing  of  the  Senate  Commerce  Committee.  We  have 
a  hearing  today  on  broadband  providers  and  consumer  privacy,  a 
subject  which  is  interesting  and  new,  relatively  new,  to  this  Com-
mittee. It is the second of a number of hearings on this subject. 

I wish all of you good morning. 
I  am  joined  by  Senator  Hutchison  who  is  the  Ranking  Member. 
Senator Inouye is not able to be with us and has asked me to chair 
the  hearing.  I  chaired  the  previous  hearing  on  this  subject  as  well 
at his request, and I am happy to do that. 

This  hearing  is  to  provide  an  examination  of  the  privacy  rights 
of  Internet  users  and  the  practices  of  broadband  providers.  The 
Commerce Committee has had a long interest in the subject of pro-
tecting  privacy,  and  now  I  feel  we  need  to  take  a  closer  look  at 
Internet  users’  privacy  as  the  field  of  online  advertising  develops. 
I  want  to  make  it  clear  that  I  understand  and  I  think  all  of  my 
colleagues  in  the  Congress  would  understand  that  there  are  many 
benefits  to  online  advertising.  It  is  an  architecture  that  is  impor-
tant  to  our  economy.  It  allows  many  of  the  sites  and  services  that 
we  all  know  and  understand  to  grow  and  thrive.  So  this  is  not  an 
inquiry about whether advertising is relevant or important. Adver-
tising  on  the  Internet  plays  an  important  role  in  Internet  com-
merce. 

While most of the conversation about Internet advertising in the 
past  years  has  been  focused  on  economic  benefits,  however,  con-
sumers  say  in  surveys  that  they  worry  about  privacy.  Survey  re-
sults released today from Consumer Reports shows that 72 percent 
of  consumers  are  concerned  that  their  online  behavior  is  being 
tracked  or  profiled,  and  they  are  concerned  about  that.  The  poll 
found  that  93  percent  of  Americans  think  Internet  companies 
should always ask permission before using personal information. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

I  think  it  is  the  case  that  the  invisibility  of  data  collection  prac-
tices  and  users’  ability  to  control  their  information  is  a  concern, 
and I think it is time that the Senate and regulators try to under-
stand and focus on what are the privacy questions and the aspects 
of the issue of privacy that we should be dealing with. 

In July, we held a hearing on privacy to examine concerns about 
consumers  being  profiled  and  being  tracked  online.  There  is  a  lot 
the Committee has yet to learn about data collection practices. We 
learned  some  things  at  the  last  hearing.  We  heard  from  NebuAd, 
a  company  that  was  working  with  some  Internet  service  providers 
to  gain  access  to  the  content  on  their  networks  in  order  to  provide 
advertisers  profiles  of  broadband  providers’  customers.  NebuAd 
later halted those plans. 

In  July,  the  broadband  providers  were  not  able  to  attend  our 
hearing. For many of them, this was a new area, and today we ap-
preciate  the  participation  of  AT&T,  Verizon,  and  Time  Warner 
Cable.  It  should  be  noted  that  these  companies  had  not  previously 
agreed  to  provide  customer  data  to  NebuAd  or  similar  companies. 
We  also  appreciate  the  participation  today  of  Public  Knowledge 

at this hearing. 

We  will  focus  on  privacy  expectations  for  customers  of  Internet 
service  providers.  People  do  expose  themselves  online  by  where 
they  go  and  what  they  do,  and  often  type  in  sensitive  information, 
personal  information,  and  financial  information.  We  have  very  lit-
tle  competition  in  the  broadband  market.  As  a  matter  of  fact, 
around  most  of  this  country,  most  Americans  have  one  or  at  the 
most perhaps two choices for broadband. And as broadband service 
is so vital to the American people and to our communities, we want 
to  make  sure  that  providers  are  respecting  the  privacy  protections 
of consumers and that those protections are in place. Internet serv-
ice  providers  have  access  to  all  of  that  customer’s  information  and 
behavior, and the question is what is being done with it. 

Again,  let  me  emphasize  that  I  appreciate  the  Internet  service 
providers  being  willing  to  come  to  us  today  and  talk  about  these 
issues  because  the  issues  are  not  just  important  to  policymakers. 
These  issues  I  think  are  important  in  the  long  term  to  Internet 
service providers as well. 

I  do  think  we  need  to  update  our  privacy  laws  and  we  need  to 
ensure  we  have  similar  protection  across  platforms.  We  need  to 
protect  sensitive  information,  make  sure  customers  know  what 
companies  are  doing  with  their  information  so  that  customers  can 
make  informed  choices  about  their  participation,  and  are  given 
clear  information  about  opt-in  or  dealing  with  other  regimes  that 
might be established. 

This  is  the  second  hearing,  and  I  assume  that  the  Commerce 
Committee  will  want  to  hear  more  as  we  enter  the  next  session  of 
Congress.  Now  the  Committee  is  here  to  listen  and  to  thank  the 
witnesses for testifying. 

Let me call on my colleague from Texas, Senator Hutchison. 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Well,  thank  you,  Senator  Dorgan.  I  appre-
ciate  your  calling  attention  to  this  issue,  and  I  want  to  say  that  it 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

is  an  important  issue  that  we  look  at  because  we  know  that  there 
are  many  advertising  opportunities  now  on  the  Internet,  which  is 
a  good  thing,  as  the  Senator  said.  It  is  good  for  the  economy.  It  is 
also  good  for  business  to  be  able  to  target  advertising  and  be  able 
to have efficient use of the advertising dollars. 

I also think it is helpful to consumers to be able to find the prod-
ucts  they  are  looking  for,  the  services  that  they  are  looking  for  in 
a  targeted  way,  and  that  provides  more  free  service  on  the  Inter-
net,  which  is  what  we  all  want.  So  that  is  the  good  side  of  adver-
tising. 

On  the  other  side,  we  surely  need  to  be  informed.  Consumers 
need to be informed about what online entities are doing with their 
personal data information, and of course, since so many, especially 
in  our  rural  areas,  depend  on  broadband  for  commerce,  as  well  as 
health  care  and  education,  people  are  putting  more  of  their  per-
sonal  information  online.  So  I  think  transparency  and  disclosure 
are very important. 

I would say I hope we do not charge into legislating in this area 
before  we  do  fully  understand  what  is  possible,  what  is  not  pos-
sible, what is helpful, and what is not helpful, and what would help 
the right type of opportunities but not hinder the overall ways that 
we  can  have  access  to  advertising.  So  it  is  a  complicated  area  and 
one  that  we  ought  to  look  at,  fully  understand  before  we  rush  into 
legislation that could curb our economy. 

I  want  to  say  that  I  am  not  going  to  be  able  to  stay.  I  have  to 
be  on  the  floor  at  10:30,  but  I  appreciate  your  calling  this  hearing 
and I will certainly look at the testimony later. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator Hutchison, thank you very much. 
I share the view. I do not think that there will be a stirring here 
to  rush  toward  some  sort  of  legislative  approach.  I  think,  first,  it 
is  very  important  that  we  understand  this.  There  may  well  need 
to  be  legislative  solutions  at  some  point  in  the  future,  but  first,  I 
think it is a complicated area and we need to understand it. I cer-
tainly agree with that. 

Senator Vitter? 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator VITTER. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman, for calling 
this  hearing  as  well.  We  examined  this  issue  earlier  this  year  in 
a hearing with other online companies. So I am looking forward to 
the  views  of  these  Internet  service  providers  and  others  on  this 
very important issue. 

I  agree  we  need  to  look  at  this  carefully.  We  need  to  attack  bad 
behavior.  We  need  to  do  it  in  a  way  that  will  not  be  out  of  date 
tomorrow  as  technology  advances,  and  I  think  we  need  to  do  it  in 
a  way  that  is  not  technology-specific,  picking  winners  and  losers, 
but sets a broad-based policy in a way that can effectively be imple-
mented. 

So  I  look  forward  to  listening  closely  to  the  testimony  to  figure 

out how we can best accomplish that. Thank you. 

Senator DORGAN. Thank you, Senator Vitter. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

We have four witnesses today. We will, by consent, include their 
entire  statements  as  a  part  of  the  permanent  record  and  ask  the 
witnesses to summarize their statements. 

First, we will hear from Ms. Dorothy Attwood, who is the Senior 
Vice President for Public Policy and Chief Privacy Officer for AT&T 
Services.  Ms.  Attwood,  thank  you  for  being  with  us.  You  may  pro-
ceed. 

STATEMENT OF DOROTHY ATTWOOD 

SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, PUBLIC POLICY 
AND CHIEF PRIVACY OFFICER, AT&T INC. 

Ms.  ATTWOOD.  Thank  you  very  much.  Thank  you,  Senator  Dor-
gan and other Committee Members, for providing AT&T the oppor-
tunity  to  discuss  online  behavioral  advertising  and  its  important 
privacy implications. 

My  name  is  Dorothy  Attwood  and  I  am  AT&T’s  Senior  Vice 

President and Chief Privacy Officer. 

Senator Dorgan, AT&T appreciates your leadership on this issue. 
It  has  fomented  a  necessary  and  productive  discussion  among  all 
key  stakeholders,  and  it  has  encouraged  our  industry  to  listen 
closely to our customers and take a careful look at how best to en-
gage in different modes of online advertising. Indeed, you will hear 
today  a  remarkable  consensus  about  the  overriding  importance  of 
a consumer-focused approach to online advertising and the need to 
ensure that consumers maintain ultimate and effective control over 
their information. 

American  consumers  benefit  immeasurably  from  our  Internet 
ecosystem,  which  is  rich  in  innovative  services  and  varied  content 
information and entertainment. Online advertising is a key compo-
nent of this ecosystem as it fuels investment and enables many free 
and discounted services and funds today’s vast diversity of Internet 
content. 

But  online  advertising,  especially  new  forms  of  highly  targeted 
behavioral  advertising,  also  raise  important  consumer  privacy  con-
cerns that policymakers and industry must carefully weigh. Setting 
proper  policy  in  this  area  is  crucial  to  maximizing  the  consumer 
benefit of a healthy Internet marketplace. 

Online  behavioral  advertising  is  the  practice  of  tracking  a  con-
sumer’s  web  browsing  and  search  activity  across  unrelated 
Websites.  Notably,  both  the  tracking  and  the  association  of  the 
websites  are  largely  invisible  to  the  end  user  and  the  resulting  in-
formation is used to create a distinct user profile and deliver highly 
targeted  or  personalized  advertising.  It  is,  indeed,  a  next  genera-
tion  capability  and  it  can  clearly  be  distinguished  from  the  simple 
and  longstanding  practice  of  tracking  a  consumer’s  use  of  an  indi-
vidual Website or obviously related Websites. 

AT&T does not today engage in online behavioral advertising ei-
ther  through  the  so-called  ‘‘deep  packet’’  inspection  or  any  other 
technique. Of course, if done properly, the practice can be valuable 
to consumers and can measurably improve their online experience. 
But we believe just as strongly that it is essential to include strong 
privacy  protections  in  the  design  of  any  online  behavioral  adver-
tising  program  and  that  any  privacy  framework  should  shed  clari-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

fying  light  on  what  is  today  something  quite  invisible  to  the  con-
sumer. 

Thus,  we  will  engage  in  online  behavioral  advertising  only  after 
validating the various technologies and only after establishing clear 
and  consistent  methods  to  ensure  the  protection  of  and  ultimate 
consumer  control  over  consumer  information.  Our  deployment  of 
any  online  behavioral  advertising  practice  will  be  governed  by  the 
imperative  of  meaningful  consent  and  a  consumer-focused  privacy 
framework  based  on  the  following  principles:  transparency,  cus-
tomer control, privacy protection, and customer value. 

More  specifically,  we  believe  that  a  forward-looking  advertising 
practice  requires  a  forward-looking  customer  notice  and  consent 
model.  For  this  reason,  AT&T  will  not  use  consumer  information 
for  online  behavioral  advertising  without  an  affirmative  advance 
action by the customer that is based on a clear explanation of how 
the  consumer’s  action  will  affect  the  use  of  her  information.  This 
means that a consumer’s failure to act will not result in any collec-
tion  and  use  of  that  consumer’s  information  for  online  behavioral 
advertising purposes by default. 

Even though AT&T and most other Internet service providers do 
not engage in online behavioral advertising, make no mistake, this 
practice  is  well  underway  today.  Already  ad  networks  and  search 
engines  track  and  store  a  vast  trove  of  data  about  consumers’  on-
line  activities,  and  the  technologies  they  use  have  evolved  just  be-
yond  tracking  consumers’  web  surfing  activity  at  sites  at  which 
they  sell  advertising.  They  now  also  have  the  ability  to  observe  a 
user’s  entire  web  browsing  experience  at  a  granular  level.  If  any-
thing,  this  largely  invisible  practice  of  ad  networks  and  search  en-
gines  raise  at  least  the  same  privacy  concerns  as  do  other  online 
behavioral techniques that ISPs could employ. 

For this reason, we believe that any privacy framework for online 
behavioral  advertising  must  apply  to  all  entities  involved  in  Inter-
net  advertising,  including  ad  networks,  search  engines,  and  ISPs. 
A  policy  regime  that  applies  only  to  one  set  of  actors  will  arbi-
trarily  favor  one  business  model  or  technology  over  another,  but 
most  importantly  represent  only  a  partial  and  entirely  unpredict-
able solution for consumers. 

Thus, we urge all entities that engage in online behavioral adver-
tising,  including  especially  those  who  already  are  engaging  in  the 
practice, to join AT&T in committing to a policy of advance, affirm-
ative consumer consent. 

Again,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  here  today,  and  I 

look forward to your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Attwood follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DOROTHY ATTWOOD, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, 

PUBLIC POLICY AND CHIEF PRIVACY OFFICER, AT&T INC. 

Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye  and  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  for  providing 
AT&T  Inc.  the  opportunity  to  discuss  online  advertising  and,  more  specifically,  the 
issue  that  has  received  a  good  deal  of  recent  attention,  so-called  online  behavioral 
advertising.  We  trust  that  this  hearing  will  help  the  discussion  evolve  past  slogans 
and  rhetoric  to  a  more  thoughtful  examination  of  the  facts  and  the  development  of 
a  holistic  consumer  privacy  policy  framework  that  all  participants  in  the  online  be-
havioral advertising sphere can and will adopt. 

Your  interest  in  these  matters  surely  is  warranted.  Online  advertising  fuels  in-
vestment and innovation across a wide range of Internet activities, and provides the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

revenue  that  enables  consumers  to  enjoy  many  free  and  discounted  services.  Like-
wise, website publishers make most of their money from advertising, which revenue 
in  turn  funds  today’s  vast  wealth  and  diversity  of  Internet  content  and  informa-
tion—most of which consumers enjoy, again, for free. On the other hand, online ad-
vertising, especially next-generation forms of highly targeted behavioral advertising 
that involve tracking consumer web browsing and search activities, raise important 
consumer-privacy concerns that policymakers and industry must carefully weigh. In 
short,  setting  proper  policy  in  this  area  will  be  crucial  to  a  healthy  and  growing 
Internet ecosystem that benefits consumers. 

AT&T does not today engage in online behavioral advertising, but we understand 
the  uniquely  sensitive  nature  of  this  practice.  We  have  listened  to  our  customers 
and  watched  the  debate  unfold,  and  are  responding  by  advocating  for  a  consumer- 
focused  framework.  As  described  in  more  detail  herein,  the  pillars  of  this  frame-
work—transparency,  consumer  control,  privacy  protection,  and  consumer  value—can 
be  the  foundation  of  a  consistent  regime  applicable  to  all  players  in  the  online  be-
havioral  advertising  sphere—including  not  just  Internet  Service  Providers  (‘‘ISPs’’), 
but  also  search  engines  and  third  party  advertising  networks—that  both  ensures 
that consumers have ultimate control over the use of their personal information and 
guards against privacy abuses.1 

In  particular,  we  believe  that  effective  customer  control  for  online  behavioral  ad-
vertising requires meaningful consent and therefore commit that AT&T will not use 
consumer  information  for  online  behavioral  advertising  without  an  affirmative,  ad-
vance  action  by  the  consumer  that  is  based  on  a  clear  explanation  of  how  the  con-
sumer’s action will affect the use of her information. This concept—often generically 
referred to as ‘‘opt-in’’—means that a consumer’s failure to act will not result in any 
collection  and  use  by  default  of  that  consumer’s  information  for  online  behavioral 
advertising purposes. This affirmative consent model differs materially from the de-
fault-based privacy policies that advertising networks and search engines—which al-
ready are engaged in online behavioral advertising—currently employ. Given the ob-
vious  consumer  benefits  of  such  a  model,  we  encourage  all  companies  that  engage 
in  online  behavioral  advertising—regardless  of  the  nature  of  their  business  models 
or  the  technologies  they  utilize—likewise  to  adopt  this  affirmative-advance-consent 
paradigm. 
What is Online Behavioral Advertising? 

There is no single, settled definition of online behavioral advertising in statute or 
case  law,  but  the  FTC  and  others  have  used  the  term  to  refer  to  it  as  the  tracking 
of a consumer’s web search and web browsing activities—by tracking either the per-
son  or  a  particular  Internet  access  device,  be  it  a  computer,  data-enabled  mobile 
phone, or some other communications vehicle—to create a distinct profile of the con-
sumer’s online behavior. In this sense, it can clearly be distinguished from the sim-
ple  practice  of  tracking  a  consumer’s  use  of  an  individual  website  or  obviously-re-
lated  websites  (such  as  those  operated  under  a  common  trademark,  trade  name  or 
conspicuously  disclosed  corporate  affiliation),  which  practice  does  not  necessarily 
raise the same privacy concerns as online behavioral advertising but which nonethe-
less can and should expressly be disclosed to Internet users. Privacy concerns about 
online behavioral advertising are not new—indeed, DoubleClick’s (now a Google sub-
sidiary)  use  of  tracking  cookies  to  collect  and  use  information  about  consumer  web 
browsing activity was the subject of an FTC proceeding in 2000.2 More recently, the 
FTC  and  Congress  have  appropriately  asked  questions  about  the  privacy  implica-
tions  of  emerging  online  advertising  businesses  that  involve  the  tracking  of  con-
sumer  web  browsing  and  search  activity.  Thus,  consistent  with  the  focus  of  recent 
public  discussion,  we  consider  online  behavioral  advertising  to  be:  (1)  the  tracking 
of  user  web  browsing  and  search  activity  across  unrelated  websites,  (2)  when  the 
tracking  and  association  of  the  websites  or  their  components  are  largely  invisible 
to the user, and (3) the resulting information is used to create a distinct user profile 
and deliver targeted advertising content. 

Online  behavioral  advertising  can  take  many  forms.  It  can,  for  instance,  involve 
the use by an ISP of technologies to capture and analyze a user’s Internet browsing 
activities  and  experience  across  unrelated  websites.  These  more  ISP-specific  meth-

1 The  policy  framework  that  AT&T  proposes  here  is  informed  by  and  should  complement  the 
Online  Behavioral  Advertising  Self-Regulatory  Principles  issued  by  staff  of  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission  in  December  of  last  year.  Online  Behavioral  Advertising:  Moving  the  Discussion 
Forward  to  Possible  Self-Regulatory  Principles,  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/05/2007/12/ 
P85900stmt.pdf. 

2 Letter from Joel Winston, Acting Associate Director, Division of Financial Practices, Bureau 
of Consumer Protection, Federal Trade Commission, to ChristineVarney, Hogan & Hartson, Re: 
DoubleClick Inc. (Jan. 22, 2001)(memorializing closure of FTC staff investigation). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

odologies  are  not,  however,  the  only—and  certainly  are  not  nearly  the  most  preva-
lent—forms of online behavioral advertising. Advertising-network technologies have 
evolved beyond solely tracking consumer web surfing activity at sites on which they 
sell advertising. They now also have the ability to observe a user’s entire web brows-
ing  experience  at  a  granular  level.  Techniques  include  the  ad  network  ‘‘dropping’’ 
third-party  tracking  ‘‘cookies’’  on  a  consumer’s  computer  to  capture  consumer  visits 
to any one of thousands of unrelated websites; embedding software on PCs; or auto-
matically  downloading  applications  that—unbeknownst  to  the  consumer—log  the 
consumer’s full session of browsing activity. 

Ad  networks  and  other  non-ISPs  employ  these  capabilities  at  the  individual 
browser  or  computer  level  and  they  are  as  effective  as  any  technique  that  an  ISP 
might employ at creating specific customer profiles and enabling highly targeted ad-
vertising.  Already  ad  networks  and  search  engines  track  and  store  a  vast  trove  of 
data about consumers’ online activities. Google’s practices exemplify the already ex-
tensive use of online behavior advertising, particularly by nonISPs. Google logs and 
stores users’ search requests, can track the search activity by IP address and a cook-
ie that identifies the user’s unique browser, and can even correlate search activities 
across multiple sessions, leading to the creation of a distinct and detailed user pro-
file.  Through  DoubleClick,  Google  can  drop  tracking  cookies  on  consumers’  com-
puters  so  that  whenever  the  consumer  visits  websites  that  contain  a  display  ad 
placed  by  DoubleClick  (which  can  be  for  virtually  any  product  or  service),  the  con-
sumer’s web browsing activity can be tracked across seemingly unrelated sites (e.g., 
CNN.com  or  ESPN.com).  Google  further  has  access  to  enormous  amounts  of  per-
sonal  information  from  its  registered  users,  which  its  privacy  policy  expressly  con-
firms can be combined with information from other Google services or third parties 
for  the  ‘‘display  of  customized  content  and  advertising.’’  And  it  even  scans  e-mails 
from nonGmail subscribers sent to Gmail subscribers for contextual advertising pur-
poses. 

Thus,  if  anything,  the  largely  invisible  practices  of  ad-networks  and  search  en-
gines  raise  at  least  the  same  privacy  concerns  as  do  the  online  behavioral  adver-
tising  techniques  that  ISPs  could  employ,  such  as  deep-packet-inspection,  which 
have  application  beyond  mere  targeted  advertising,  including  managing  network 
congestion, detecting viruses and combating child pornography. In short, the privacy 
and  other  policy  issues  surrounding  online  behavioral  advertising  are  not  tech-
nology-specific.  The  relevant  touchstones  are  the  manner  in  which  consumer  infor-
mation  is  tracked  and  used,  and  the  manner  in  which  consumers  are  given  notice 
of  and  are  able  to  consent  to  or  prohibit  such  practices.  Those  factors  are  entirely 
technology-neutral. 
AT&T’s Approach to Online Behavioral Advertising 

AT&T does not today engage in online behavioral advertising.3 This is not because 
AT&T  sees  no  value  in  this  next-generation  form  of  online  advertising.  Indeed,  if 
done  properly,  online  behavioral  advertising  could  prove  quite  valuable  to  con-
sumers  and  could  dramatically  improve  their  online  experiences.  We  do,  however, 
believe  it  is  essential  to  include  strong  privacy  protections  in  the  design  of  any  on-
line  behavioral  advertising  program,  which  is  why  we  will  initiate  such  a  program 
only after testing and validating the various technologies and only after establishing 
clear  and  consistent  methods  and  procedures  to  ensure  the  protection  of,  and  ulti-
mate consumer control over, consumer information. We further intend to work with 
privacy  advocates,  consumer  privacy  coalitions  and  fellow  industry  participants  in 
a  cooperative,  multifaceted  effort  that  we  trust  can  and  will  lead  to  a  predictable 
consumer driven framework in this area. In any event, if AT&T deploys these tech-
nologies and processes, it will do so the right way. 

Against  this  backdrop,  AT&T  has  already  listened  closely  to  its  customers  and 
will  adopt  meaningful  and  flexible  privacy  principles  that  will  guide  any  effort  to 
engage  in  online  behavioral  advertising.  We  summarize  this  framework  as  follows: 

3 AT&T  does  engage  in  some  of  the  more  ordinary  and  established  aspects  of  online  adver-
tising. Like virtually every entity with a retail Internet presence, AT&T tracks usage on its own 
websites, such as att.com, in order to improve the online experience, optimize a particular site’s 
capabilities  and  ease-of-use,  and  provide  the  most  useful  information  to  consumers  about 
AT&T’s  products  and  services.  In  addition,  like  thousands  of  other  businesses  that  operate 
websites,  AT&T  does  business  with  advertising  networks  and  has  partnered  with  providers  of 
online search. For example, on the AT&T broadband Internet access portal, AT&T makes space 
available  for  advertising  provided  by  the  Yahoo!  advertising  network,  and  users  of  the  portal 
may  be  shown  advertising  that  is  based  on  their  activity  across  sites  signed  up  to  the  Yahoo! 
advertising  network.  Also  by  way  of  example,  we  have  arranged  for  the  Google  search  box  to 
appear  on  our  my.att.net  site.  In  this  regard,  then,  we  are  no  different  than  any  other  website 
publisher. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

• Transparency:  Consumers  must  have  full  and  complete  notice  of  what  informa-

tion will be collected, how it will be used, and how it will be protected. 

• Consumer Control: Consumers must have easily understood tools that will allow 
them to exercise meaningful consent, which should be a sacrosanct precondition 
to tracking online activities to be used for online behavioral advertising. 

• Privacy  protection:  The  privacy  of  consumers/users  and  their  personal  informa-
tion will be vigorously protected, and we will deploy technology to guard against 
unauthorized access to personally identifiable information. 

• Consumer Value: The consumer benefits of an online behavioral advertising pro-
gram  include  the  ability  to  receive  a  differentiated,  secure  Internet  experience 
that  provides  consumers  with  customized  Internet  advertisements  that  are  rel-
evant to their interests. But we think the future is about much more than just 
customized advertising. Consumers have shown that in a world of almost limit-
less choices in the content and services available on the Internet, they see great 
value in being able to customize their unique online experience. That is the ulti-
mate  promise  of  the  technological  advances  that  are  emerging  in  the  market 
today. 

Call to Action 

We  believe  these  principles  offer  a  rational  approach  to  protecting  consumer  pri-
vacy while allowing the market for Internet advertising and its related products and 
services to grow. But, in order for consumers truly to be in control of their informa-
tion, all entities involved in Internet advertising, including ad networks, search en-
gines and ISPs, will need to adhere to a consistent set of principles. A policy regime 
that  applies  only  to  one  set  of  actors  will  arbitrarily  favor  one  business  model  or 
technology over another and, more importantly, represent only a partial and entirely 
unpredictable  solution  for  consumers.  After  all,  consumers  do  not  want  information 
and control with respect to just a subset of potential online advertising or the track-
ing and targeting that might underlie those ads. Thus, we urge all entities that en-
gage  in  online  behavioral  advertising—including  especially  those  who  already  en-
gage in the practice—to join AT&T in committing to a policy of advance, affirmative 
consumer consent. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Ms.  Attwood,  thank  you  very  much  for  your 

testimony. 

Next,  we  will  hear  from  Mr.  Peter  Stern  who  is  the  Chief  Strat-

egy Officer for Time Warner Cable. Mr. Stern, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF PETER STERN, EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT, 

CHIEF STRATEGY OFFICER, TIME WARNER CABLE 

Mr.  STERN.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee. My name is Peter Stern. I am Executive Vice President and 
Chief Strategy Officer at Time Warner Cable. 

I am pleased to testify before you today and appreciate this Com-
mittee’s  diligent  effort  to  grapple  with  the  complex  and  still-evolv-
ing  Internet  advertising  marketplace  and  to  assess  its  impact  on 
consumer privacy. 

Presently, Time Warner Cable does not engage in targeted Inter-

net advertising as an ISP or as a Website operator. 

If  Time  Warner  Cable  decides  to  engage  in  such  activities,  our 
customers’ privacy will be a fundamental consideration. The protec-
tion of subscriber privacy is not only important as a matter of pub-
lic policy. Our ability to succeed depends on winning and retaining 
the  trust  of  our  customers.  Accordingly,  we  support  a  framework 
that would provide consumers with the opportunity to affirmatively 
consent to receive online targeted advertising. 

We  believe  that  achieving  and  sustaining  our  subscribers’  trust 
requires adhering to a privacy framework that addresses four prin-
ciples:  first,  giving  customers  control;  second,  providing  trans-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

parency  and  disclosure;  third,  safeguarding  personal  information; 
and fourth, providing customers with value. 

Let  me  also  add,  however,  that  any  such  framework  can  only 
truly  protect  the  privacy  interests  of  consumers  if  it  is  universally 
adopted  by  all  providers  of  targeted  online  advertising.  Quite  sim-
ply, it makes no difference to a consumer whether a targeted online 
ad is based on data collected by an ISP, an ad network, or an appli-
cations  provider.  A  framework  that  leaves  any  provider  uncovered 
would  leave  all  users  unprotected.  In  addition,  common  rules  are 
the only way to ensure all businesses can compete on a level play-
ing field. 

Let me elaborate briefly on the four principles I have mentioned. 
First, customer control means consumers will be able to exercise 
affirmative  consent  before  having  their  online  activities  collected 
and  used  for  targeted  online  advertising.  Internet  subscribers  that 
decline to consent or fail to act should not have their online activi-
ties  tracked  or  used  for  targeted  online  advertising.  Control  also 
means  that  the  consent  mechanism  should  be  easy  to  use.  Cus-
tomers  should  be  free  to  change  their  election  at  any  time,  and 
their election will remain in effect unless they change it. 

Second,  transparency  and  disclosure  means  ensuring  that  a  cus-
tomer’s  consent  to  targeted  online  advertising  is  informed.  This 
means giving Internet users clear and timely notice regarding what 
is collected, how it is used, and what consumers need to do if they 
do not want to participate. And by this, we do not mean fine print. 
We mean prominent and plain English. 

Third,  safeguarding  information  means  preventing  unauthorized 
access to customers’ personal information. It also means preventing 
disclosure  or  sale  of  such  information  to  third  parties  absent  con-
sent of the customer. 

Last,  providing  value  means  offering  targeted  online  advertising 
in  a  manner  that  enhances  the  Internet  experience  for  consumers. 
Instead  of  a  barrage  of  irrelevant  ads,  consumers  can  receive  ads 
tailored  to  reflect  their  interests.  Targeted  online  advertising  can 
also  be  used  to  protect  consumers  from  seeing  ads  they  do  not 
want. Advertising can be a public good when it educates consumers 
about relevant choices. 

Most  companies  that  provide  services  on  the  Internet  are  pres-
ently  under  no  obligation  to  disclose  or  obtain  consent  for  the  col-
lection  and  use  of  consumers’  online  information.  While  some  pro-
vide disclosure and give consumers the ability to opt out, this falls 
short of the principle of consumer control I have articulated. 

Therefore,  Time  Warner  Cable  believes  that  the  four  principles 
I  have  outlined  should  serve  as  a  policy  framework  that  would 
apply  to  all  companies  involved  in  targeted  online  advertising. 
Time Warner Cable stands ready to work with this Committee and 
other stakeholders to help foster the development and implementa-
tion of such a framework. 

I  thank  the  Members  of  this  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to 
appear  before  you  today  on  this  important  issue,  and  I  would  be 
happy to answer any questions you might have. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Stern follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PETER STERN, EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT, 

CHIEF STRATEGY OFFICER, TIME WARNER CABLE 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Committee,  my  name  is  Peter 
Stern.  I  am  Executive  Vice  President  and  Chief  Strategy  Officer  at  Time  Warner 
Cable,  where  I  am  responsible  for  strategy  and  planning,  including  for  our  Road 
Runner high-speed online service. 

I  am  pleased  to  testify  before  you  today  and  appreciate  this  Committee’s  diligent 
effort  to  grapple  with  the  complex  and  still-evolving  Internet  advertising  market-
place and to assess its impact on consumer privacy. 

Presently,  Time  Warner  Cable  does  not  engage  in  targeted  Internet  advertising 

as an ISP or as a website operator. 

Should Time Warner Cable decide to engage in such activities, our customers’ pri-
vacy will be a fundamental consideration. The protection of subscriber privacy is not 
only  important  as  a  matter  of  public  policy,  but  it  is  also  central  to  the  success  of 
our  business.  The  bedrock  foundation  of  our  business  is  our  relationship  with  our 
subscribers. We operate in a highly competitive marketplace, and our ability to suc-
ceed  depends  on  winning  and  retaining  the  trust  of  those  customers.  Accordingly, 
we  support  a  framework  that  would  provide  consumers  with  the  opportunity  to  af-
firmatively consent to receive online targeted advertising. 

In  the  context  of  targeted  online  advertising,  we  believe  that  achieving  and  sus-
taining  our  subscribers’  trust  requires  adherence  to  a  privacy  framework  that  ad-
dresses  four  principles:  first,  giving  customers  control;  second,  providing  trans-
parency  and  disclosure;  third,  safeguarding  personal  information;  and  fourth,  pro-
viding customers with value. 

Let me also add, however, that we strongly believe that any such framework can 
only  truly  protect  the  privacy  interests  of  consumers  if  it  is  universally  adopted  by 
all  providers  of  targeted  online  advertising,  including  ad  networks,  application  pro-
viders and ISPs. Quite simply, it makes no difference to a consumer whether a tar-
geted  online  ad  is  based  on  data  collected  by  an  ISP,  an  ad  network  or  an  applica-
tions  provider.  A  framework  that  leaves  any  provider  uncovered  would  leave  all 
users  unprotected.  In  addition,  a  common  set  of  rules  protecting  consumer  privacy 
is  the  only  way  to  ensure  that  all  businesses  that  provide  online  advertising  can 
compete and innovate on a level playing field. 

Before I go any further, allow me to clarify our definition of targeted online adver-
tising  for  the  purposes  of  applying  the  framework  I  described.  At  Time  Warner 
Cable,  we  define  it  as  displaying  different  online  ads  to  a  consumer  based  on  that 
consumer’s  behavior  on  unrelated  websites.  So,  if  ads  are  delivered  to  a  consumer 
based on that consumer’s particular history of visits to multiple unrelated websites, 
that’s targeted online advertising. 

On the other hand, delivering relevant ads to a consumer based on their behavior 
on an individual website (or group of related websites) is not targeted online adver-
tising.  For  example,  if  you  go  to  Apple’s  website  and  search  for  an  iPod,  and  Apple 
delivers ads and promotions for iPods while you are still on the Apple website, that’s 
not targeted online advertising. That’s being responsive to what you asked for, when 
and  where  you  wanted  it.  It  becomes  targeted  online  advertising,  however,  if  this 
information  is  retained  in  order  to  deliver  ads  for  iPods  and  other  portable  music 
players while you are visiting unrelated websites. 

Let me elaborate briefly on the four principles I’ve mentioned. 
First,  customer  control  means  consumers  will  be  able  to  exercise  affirmative  con-
sent  to  having  their  activities  collected  and  used  for  targeted  online  advertising. 
Internet  subscribers  that  decline  to  consent  or  fail  to  act  should  not  have  their  on-
line  activities  tracked  or  used  for  targeted  online  advertising.  Control  also  means 
that  the  consent  mechanisms  should  be  easy  to  use,  to  ensure  that  customers  are 
free to change their election at any time, and that their election will remain in effect 
unless they change it. 

Second, transparency and disclosure means ensuring that a customer’s consent to 
targeted online advertising is informed. This means giving Internet users clear and 
timely  notice  regarding  what  type  of  online  usage  information  is  tracked  and  col-
lected,  how  that  information  is  used  to  provide  targeted  online  advertising,  and 
what  steps  consumers  can  take  should  they  decline  to  participate.  And  by  this,  we 
don’t mean fine print. We mean prominent and plain English. 

Third,  safeguarding  personal  information  means  preventing  unauthorized  access 
to  customers’  personal  information.  It  also  should  mean  preventing  disclosure  or 
sale  of  such  information  to  third  parties  absent  consent  of  the  customer.  We  also 
believe  that  policymakers  and  the  public  should  continue  to  discuss  whether  there 
are  categories  of  particularly  sensitive  information,  such  as  personal  medical  infor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

mation,  that  should  be  entirely  off  limits  to  targeted  online  advertising  or  subject 
to special controls. 

Last, providing value means offering targeted online advertising in a manner that 
enhances the Internet experience for consumers. Time Warner Cable firmly believes 
that targeted online advertising can benefit consumers. Instead of a barrage of irrel-
evant  ads,  subscribers  can  receive  information  about  services  and  offerings  tailored 
to reflect their interests. Targeted online advertising can also be used to protect con-
sumers  from  seeing  ads  they  don’t  want.  Advertising  can  be  a  public  good,  when  it 
educates  consumers  about  relevant  choices.  Properly  implemented,  technology  can 
help  advertising  achieve  this  potential,  possibly  even  increasing  the  number  of  ads 
consumers want to see. 

In  addition,  targeted  online  advertising  provides  important  benefits  for  adver-
tisers  and  providers  of  Internet  applications  and  services.  Revenues  from  such  ad-
vertising can offset the costs of providing services to consumers, and can allow busi-
nesses to offer services at discounts or even without direct payment from end users. 
In  this  manner,  targeted  online  advertising  can  deliver  value  to  consumers  while 
helping to preserve and promote access to and enjoyment of the rich diversity of the 
Internet. 

Most companies that provide services on the Internet are presently under no obli-
gation  to  disclose,  or  obtain  consent  for,  the  collection  and  use  of  consumers’  online 
usage information. And in the case of some of the largest ad networks and applica-
tions providers, the amount of information such companies possess about consumers 
dwarfs that obtained by ISPs. 

It is certainly true that many providers of targeted online advertising already vol-
untarily  disclose  the  extent  to  which  they  collect  and  use  data  about  consumers. 
And  some  may  also  provide  consumers  the  ability  to  ‘‘opt  out’’  of  participating  in 
such  an  arrangement.  But  the  extent  of  such  disclosure  varies  greatly  and  is  often 
opaque;  and  the  process  for  opting  out  can  be  complicated,  and  in  any  case  falls 
short of the principle of consumer control I have articulated. 

Therefore,  Time  Warner  Cable  believes  that  the  four  principles  I  have  outlined— 
customer  control,  transparency  and  disclosure,  safeguarding  personal  information, 
and providing value—should serve as the cornerstone of a uniform policy framework 
that  would  apply  to  all  companies  involved  in  targeted  online  advertising.  Time 
Warner Cable stands ready to work with this Committee and other stakeholders to 
help foster the development and implementation of such a framework. 

I  thank  the  Members  of  this  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you 
today  on  this  important  issue,  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  you 
might have. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Stern, thank you very much for being with 

us. 

Next,  we  will  hear  from  Mr.  Tom  Tauke,  the  Executive  Vice 
President  of  Public  Affairs,  Policy  and  Communications  at  Verizon 
Communications. Mr. Tauke, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF THOMAS J. TAUKE, 

EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT, VERIZON 

Mr. TAUKE. Verizon is not engaged in behavioral advertising, but 
we  are  very  much  aware  of  the  concerns  that  have  been  expressed 
by consumers and this Committee about some of the practices that 
other  Internet  players  are  engaged  in  to  send  targeted  advertising 
to consumers. Therefore, we have focused attention within Verizon 
on  what  policies  and  practices  related  to  online  advertising  we 
should  follow  to  keep  faith  with  our  own  customers.  And  we’ve 
looked at what practices would work for the entire on-line industry. 
Perhaps it would be useful if I just outlined the framework of our 

First,  we  focused  on  the  consumer  and  tried  to  look  at  the  issue 
from  his  or  her  perspective.  It  seemed  clear  to  us  that  consumers 
want  information  so  they  know  what  is  going  on.  They  want  to  be 
in  control  of  their  online  experience,  and  they  want  to  be  able  to 

thinking. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

choose  whether  or  not  their  online  usage  is  tracked  and  used  to 
send them targeted advertising. 

Second,  we  concluded  that  any  policy  governing  online  adver-
tising  should  be  centered  around  the  notion  of  meaningful  consent 
by  the  consumer.  We  had  a  lot  of  discussion  about  opt  in  and  opt 
out. We concluded that those terms are not particularly meaningful 
in the online world. Most consumers, I suspect, are like me. We are 
trying to do something online. The screen pops up. We hit ‘‘OK’’ or 
‘‘continue’’  and  move  on,  not  really  aware  of  what  we  just  opted 
into. 

So  we  focused  on  the  concept  of  meaningful  consent  and  what 
that means. Our sense is that meaningful consumer consent in this 
context requires three elements. 

One,  transparency.  That  means  conspicuous  and  clearly  ex-
plained  disclosure  to  consumers  about  what  types  of  data  are  col-
lected for what purposes and how it will be used. 

Affirmative  choice  is  the  second  principle.  With  knowledge  of 
what they are choosing, consumers would have to affirmatively act, 
affirmatively agree to permit tracking of their online activity. 

And third, consumer control. Consumers should have the ongoing 

ability to change their choice. 

Senator  Dorgan,  you  put  this  pretty  well  in  a  previous  hearing 
on  this  issue  when  you  talked  about  a  consumer  going  into  the 
mall. I believe it was your daughter. If you walk into the store and 
the store keeps track of what you are doing and buying so they can 
bill you at the end, you know, you probably think that is OK. And 
if  you  do  not  like  it,  you  walk  out.  But  if  someone  starts  following 
you around the mall tracking your activity from store to store, you 
would  feel  pretty  uneasy  about  that,  I  suspect,  unless  you  had  in-
vited them along. 

Using that analogy, what we believe is that before anyone follows 
a  consumer  around  online  to  target  them  for  advertising,  that  the 
consumer  must  know  what  is  going  on,  must  make  an  affirmative 
choice  to  permit  that  activity,  and  should  be  able  to  turn  around 
at  any  time  and  say,  I  do  not  want  you  following  me  around  any-
more. 

We have been talking to other companies engaged in online serv-
ices, and we believe that there is a lot of support, as evidenced here 
today,  for  the  recommendations  we  are  making  in  the  testimony  I 
submitted to the Committee. Really, everyone should embrace poli-
cies that put the consumer in control of the online experience, and 
from consumers’ perspective, it really does not matter who is doing 
the behavioral advertising, whether it is companies providing their 
browser  or  their  search  engine,  their  access,  or  any  other  online 
service.  All  online  players  should  protect  the  privacy  of  online 
users. 

The  advertising  industry,  importantly,  also  appears  to  be  inter-
ested in establishing a set of consistent best practices. That indus-
try has a pretty good record of self-policing, with the Federal Trade 
Commission  helping  ensure  that  the  advertising  industry’s  best 
practices are enforced to protect consumers. 

With  that  model  in  mind,  we  are  reaching  out  to  the  online  in-
dustry to see if we can develop a set of best practices for online ad-
vertising  that  will  protect  consumers.  And  we  will  work  with  this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

Committee and other interested organizations to figure out how we 
can make sure the consumers feel secure and in charge when they 
are  online,  that  the  rapidly  advancing  communications  and  infor-
mation processing technology is used to enhance consumers’ online 
experience,  not  spoil  it,  and  that  the  Internet  continues  to  open 
new worlds of opportunities for each of us. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Tauke follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THOMAS J. TAUKE, EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT, VERIZON 
Chairman  Inouye,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison  and  Members  of  the  Committee: 
thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  discuss  the  important  concerns  and  perspectives 
surrounding consumer privacy in the area of online advertising. 

Today,  more  than  60  million  American  homes  are  connected  to  the  Internet  via 
broadband,  and  the  wide  range  of  content,  services,  and  applications  online—most 
offered for free—draws more people online every day. 

While  Verizon  does  not  rely  on  online  advertising  as  a  significant  source  of  rev-
enue, we recognize that it has been a key business model that has helped make the 
Internet a growth engine for the U.S. economy. 

Yet, using consumers’ web-surfing data to foster targeted online advertising raises 
complex  and  important  issues  surrounding  online  privacy.  Consumers  and  policy-
makers  want  to  understand  what  personal  information  is  being  collected  and  used 
for advertising purposes. They want to know what privacy and consumer protections 
are  in  place,  and  what  choices  are  available  to  participate—or  not—in  behavioral 
advertising models. 

In  a  rapidly  changing  and  innovative  environment  like  the  Internet,  maintaining 
consumer  trust  is  essential.  It  is  critical  that  consumers  understand  what  forms  of 
targeted  online  advertising  their  service  providers  and  favorite  websites  employ.  If 
certain practices cause consumers to believe that their privacy will not be protected, 
or  their  preferences  won’t  be  respected,  they  will  be  less  likely  to  trust  their  online 
services, and the tremendous power of the Internet to benefit consumers will be di-
minished. So, maintaining consumer trust in the online experience is critical to the 
future success of the Internet. 

With  that  in  mind,  let  me  begin  by  describing  the  online  advertising  techniques 

Verizon uses today over its wireline networks. 

Verizon’s online advertising involves the practices commonly accepted throughout 
the Internet, such as the use of cookies or ad delivery servers to provide advertising 
that  is  limited  to  users  of  Verizon’s  own  services  or  websites.  We  also  provide  ad- 
supported  search  results  to  help  consumers  find  the  websites  they  are  looking  for 
when  they  mistype  an  address.  These  practices,  which  are  neither  new  nor  unique, 
improve consumers’ interaction with our websites and services, and increase the rel-
evance of the advertising displayed to our customers or to visitors of our sites. 

One  technology  that  has  received  attention  of  late  is  ‘‘packet  inspection.’’  To  be 
clear, Verizon has not used—and does not use—packet inspection technology to tar-
get  advertising  to  customers,  and  we  have  not  deployed  the  technology  in  our 
wireline network for such purposes. 

Packet inspection can be a helpful engineering tool to manage network traffic and 
enable  online  services  and  applications  consumers  may  wish  to  use.  The  perceived 
problem  with  ‘‘packet  inspection’’  is  not  the  technology.  Many  useful  technologies 
can  be  used  for  nefarious  purposes.  The  problem  arises  if  packet  inspection  is  used 
to inappropriately track customers’ online activity without their knowledge and con-
sent and invade their personal privacy. 

In fact, any technology that is used to track and collect consumer online behavior 
for  the  purposes  of  targeted  advertising—regardless  of  which  company  is  doing  the 
collecting—should  only  be  used  with  the  customer’s  knowledge  and  consent  in  ac-
cordance  with  the  law,  a  company’s  specific  privacy  policies,  and  the  privacy  prin-
ciples outlined below. 

Protecting our customers’ privacy has long been, and will continue to be, a priority 
at Verizon. We are committed to maintaining strong and meaningful privacy protec-
tions  for  consumers  in  this  era  of  rapidly  changing  technological  advances.  We  are 
strong proponents of transparency and believe that consumers are entitled to know 
what kinds of information we collect and use, and should have ready access to effec-
tive tools that allow them to control the use of that information. 

At Verizon we have worked to craft—and communicate to our customers—respon-

sible policies aimed at protecting online privacy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

We  can  commit—and  believe  that  all  companies  should  commit—to  a  set  of  best 
practices in the area of online behavioral advertising. The principles and best prac-
tices should apply to all online companies regardless of their technology or the plat-
form  used.  The  principles  underlying  the  consumer  protection  practices  we  support 
are these: 

First, meaningful consent. 
Verizon  believes  that  before  a  company  captures  certain  Internet-usage  data  for 
targeted  or  customized  advertising  purposes,  it  should  obtain  meaningful,  affirma-
tive  consent  from  consumers.  Meaningful  consent  requires:  (1)  transparency,  (2)  af-
firmative choice, and (3) consumer control. 

Transparency  involves  conspicuous,  clearly  explained  disclosure  to  consumers  as 
to  what  types  of  data  are  collected  and  for  what  purpose  that  data  is  being  used, 
how that data is retained and for how long, and who is permitted access to the data. 
Consumers would then be able to use these clear explanations to make an affirm-
ative  choice  that  their  information  can  be  collected  and  used  for  online  behavioral 
advertising. Importantly, a consumer’s failure to consent should mean that there is 
no collection and use of that consumer’s information for online behaviorally targeted 
advertising based on tracking of the consumer’s Internet usage. 

Finally,  consumer  control  means  that  consumers  have  an  ongoing  opportunity  to 
make  a  different  choice  about  behavioral  advertising.  In  other  words,  should  con-
sumers  at  some  later  time  choose  not  to  participate  in  the  behavioral  advertising, 
there are equally clear and easy-to-use instructions to make that change. That pref-
erence should remain in effect unless and until the consumer changes it. 

Second, security practices. 
Any  company  engaged  in  tracking  and  collecting  consumer  online  behavioral  in-
formation  must  have  appropriate  access,  security,  and  technological  controls  to 
guard against unauthorized access to any personal information. 

Third, safeguards for sensitive information. 
Special attention must be given to the protection of information of a sensitive na-
ture (e.g., accessing medical websites). This information should not be collected and 
used  for  online  behavioral  advertising  unless  specific,  affirmative  consent,  and  cus-
tomer  controls  are  in  place  to  limit  such  use.  Specific  policies  may  be  necessary  to 
deal with this type of information. 

Consistent  with  our  long-standing  policies  and  practices,  Verizon  also  believes 
that the content of communications, such as e-mail, instant messages, or VoIP calls, 
should  not  be  used,  analyzed,  or  disclosed  for  purposes  of  Internet-based  targeted 
advertising. 

Fourth, certification. 
It  is  critical  that  all  participants  in  online  advertising—ad  networks,  publishers, 
search engines, Internet service providers, browser developers and other application 
providers—commit  to  these  common  sense  principles  and  best  practices  through  a 
broad-based,  third  party  coalition.  To  achieve  this,  we  plan  to  work  with  stake-
holders in the Internet and advertising arenas, including other companies, industry 
groups and policy organizations. 

The  focus  of  this  coalition  and  the  principles  should  be  the  protection  of  con-
sumers, not the technology or applications that happen to enable the data collection. 
Widespread and uniform adoption of principles will greatly enhance the public trust, 
address  expressed  privacy  concerns  regarding  web  tracking  practices,  and  serve  as 
a foundation for further discussion with policymakers and consumer groups. 

We believe that companies engaged in online behavioral advertising should agree 
to  participate  in  a  credible,  third-party  certification  process  to  demonstrate  to  con-
sumers  that  they  are  doing  what  they  say  with  regard  to  the  collection  and  use  of 
information for online behavioral advertising. This process would confirm that com-
panies  are  complying  with  and  respecting  consumers’  expressed  choices  regarding 
such data collection. 

We  believe  a  framework  such  as  this  is  a  rational  approach  that  protects  con-
sumer  privacy,  while  allowing  the  market  for  Internet  advertising  and  its  related 
products and services to grow. 

Should  a  company  fail  to  comply  with  these  principles,  we  believe  the  Federal 
Trade  Commission  has  authority  over  abuses  in  the  privacy  area  and  can  take  ap-
propriate  measures  against  companies  that  intentionally  violate  applicable  con-
sumer protection laws. 

We hope to use the next few months to work with all players in the Internet space 

to create and agree to live by industry best practices for online advertising. 

Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

mony. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Tauke, thank you very much for your testi-

Finally,  we  will  hear  from  Ms.  Gigi  Sohn,  the  President  and  Co- 

Founder of Public Knowledge. Ms. Sohn, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF GIGI B. SOHN, PRESIDENT, 

PUBLIC KNOWLEDGE 

Ms.  SOHN.  Senator  Dorgan,  Members  of  the  Committee,  thanks 
for giving me the opportunity today to testify on behalf of Internet 
users. 

I  would  like  to  focus  my  comments  on  the  growing  use  of  tech-

nologies known as deep packet inspection, or DPI. 

The  use  of  DPI  technology  has  serious  implications  for  the  pri-
vacy  rights  of  Americans.  Public  Knowledge,  in  partnership  with 
Free Press, has been analyzing these technologies and their impact 
on both privacy and an open Internet. Our organizations published 
a  white  paper  entitled  NebuAd  and  Partner  ISPs:  Wiretapping, 
Forgery, and Browser Hijacking, which examined the technical and 
policy  aspects  of  DPI.  I  applaud  the  Committee  for  its  scrutiny  of 
the use of these technologies. 

Simply  put,  DPI  is  the  Internet  equivalent  of  the  Postal  Service 
reading your mail. While a postal worker might read your mail for 
any  number  of  reasons,  the  fact  remains  that  your  letter  is  being 
read by the very person whose job it is to deliver it. 

When you use the Internet for web browsing, e-mail, or any other 
purpose,  the  data  you  send  and  receive  is  broken  up  into  small 
chunks  called  packets.  These  packets  are  wrapped  in  envelopes 
which,  much  like  paper  envelopes,  contain  addresses  for  both  the 
sender  and  the  receiver,  though  they  contain  little  information 
about what is inside. 

Until  recently,  when  you  handed  that  envelope  to  your  ISP,  the 
ISP  simply  read  the  address,  figured  out  where  to  send  the  enve-
lope, and handed it off to the proper mail carrier. 

Now we understand that some ISPs are opening these envelopes, 
reading  their  contents,  and  keeping  varying  amounts  of  informa-
tion  about  the  communications  inside  for  their  own  purposes.  In 
many  cases,  ISPs  are  actually  passing  copies  of  the  envelopes  on 
to  third  parties  who,  in  turn,  read  and  make  use  of  that  informa-
tion.  For  the  most  part,  customers  are  not  aware  that  their  ISPs 
are  engaging  in  this  behavior.  The  end  result  is  much  like  if  the 
Postal  Service  were  to  open  your  letter,  photocopy  it,  hand  that 
copy to a third party, and then reseal the letter so that you would 
never know it had been opened in the first place. 

So  far,  we  have  seen  ISPs  like  Comcast  use  DPI  as  a  means  to 
identify  and  block  certain  types  of  Internet  traffic,  in  violation  of 
the FCC’s Internet policy statement. We have also seen advertising 
companies  like  NebuAd  use  DPI  to  collect  browsing  histories,  on-
line habits, and other potentially personal information about users 
in  order  to  display  advertisements  targeted  to  a  specific  user’s  in-
terests. 

The very nature of DPI raises grave privacy concerns. 
As  a  result,  when  evaluating  an  implementation  of  DPI,  there 
are three basic questions that must be answered in order to assess 
both  the  impact  on  the  user’s  privacy  and  the  acceptability  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

use  of  the  technology  in  question.  First,  what  purpose  is  the  col-
lected  data  being  used  for?  Second,  how  is  the  data  collected  and 
utilized? Third, how is affirmative informed consent obtained? 

Given  the  power  of  DPI  and  the  scope  of  its  possible  uses,  it  is 
critical  that  we  establish  industry  guidelines  and  legal  protections 
for  users.  And  while  the  use  of  personal  data  by  web  service  pro-
viders is not the focus of today’s hearing, such uses raise separate, 
yet important privacy questions. 

Thus,  any  solution  should  strive  to  be  comprehensive  in  scope 
and  ensure  that  the  basic  principles  of  privacy  protection  are  ap-
plied  across  the  entire  Internet  ecosystem.  These  protections  must 
ensure,  first,  that  the  purpose  of  the  use  of  consumer  data  is  one 
that is consistent with users’ privacy expectations; second, that the 
amount  and  type  of  data  collected  is  narrowly  tailored  to  the  pro-
posed  use  and  that  the  data  is  not  kept  or  disseminated  to  third 
parties  past  what  is  necessary;  and  third,  that  customers  have  ac-
cess  to  and  actually  receive  adequate  information  about  the  pro-
posed  use  and  have  affirmatively  and  actively  consented  to  any 
practices that might violate their privacy expectations. 

To achieve these goals, Congress should pass legislation that en-
capsulates  these  requirements  and  makes  clear  that  the  FCC  has 
the power to enforce them. 

Even  though  the  Communications  Act  aims  to  provide  com-
prehensive privacy protection for users of all communications tech-
nologies, gaps in the law have allowed the privacy of some Internet 
users to fall through the cracks. The time has now come to address 
these  inequalities  and  guarantee  the  right  to  privacy  for  all  Inter-
net users. 

In  closing,  I  want  to  make  one  extra  comment  about  the  legisla-
tion. I want to commend the ISPs to my right for adopting the prin-
ciples  they  have  announced  today,  transparency,  control,  privacy 
protection,  consumer  value.  But  the  problem  is  that  the  ISPs  that 
are  not  here  are  the  ones  that  use  NebuAd  and  the  ones  that  told 
Representative  Markey  and  Representative  Barton  that  they 
thought  that  they  were  acting  within  the  law.  And  that  is  why  I 
believe  you  need  comprehensive  legislation  to  ensure  that  all  ISPs 
and not just the good guys are protecting users’ privacies. 

Public  Knowledge  is  eager  to  work  with  the  Committee  to  craft 

privacy legislation that will protect all Internet users. 

I look forward to your questions. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Sohn follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GIGI B. SOHN, PRESIDENT, PUBLIC KNOWLEDGE 

Chairman  Inouye,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison  and  Members  of  the  Committee, 
thank  you  for  giving  me  the  opportunity  to  testify  about  broadband  providers  and 
consumer privacy. I’d like to focus today on the growing use of the collection of tech-
nologies  known  as  ‘‘Deep  Packet  Inspection,’’  or  DPI,  which  has  immense  implica-
tions  for  the  privacy  rights  of  the  American  public.  Over  the  past  several  months, 
Public  Knowledge,  in  partnership  with  Free  Press,  has  been  analyzing  these  tech-
nologies  and  their  impact  on  privacy  and  an  open  Internet.  In  June,  our  organiza-
tions published a white paper entitled NebuAd and Partner ISPs: Wiretapping, For-
gery  and  Browser  Hijacking,  which  examined  the  technical  and  policy  aspects  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

DPI.  I  applaud  the  Committee  for  its  continued  scrutiny  of  the  use  of  these  tech-
nologies.1 
I. Introduction 

Today’s hearing on consumer privacy comes in the wake of two high-profile online 
consumer  privacy  violations,  both  of  which  involved  the  use  of  Deep  Packet  Inspec-
tion (DPI) technology on an Internet Service Provider’s (ISP) network. 

The first instance came to light in October 2007, when an Associated Press report 
revealed  that  Comcast  was  interfering  with  its  customers’  BitTorrent  traffic.2 The 
report  confirmed  earlier  tests  conducted  by  independent  network  researcher  Robb 
Topolski,  who  found  that  Comcast  was  analyzing  its  users’  web  traffic  in  order  to 
determine  the  types  of  applications  and  protocols  being  used.  The  company  then 
used a technique called ‘‘packet spoofing’’ to delay, degrade and in some cases, block 
traffic  that  was  identified  as  being  used  for  BitTorrent,  a  popular  peer-to-peer  file 
sharing protocol. Public Knowledge and Free Press filed a formal complaint with the 
FCC  in  November  2007,  calling  for  the  Commission  to  open  a  formal  investigation 
into the ISP’s practices.3 

In  January  2008,  the  FCC  announced  that  it  had  opened  a  formal  investigation 
into Comcast’s blocking of BitTorrent traffic. This investigation concluded in August 
2008  with  the  FCC  upholding  the  Public  Knowledge  and  Free  Press  complaint  and 
reprimanding  Comcast  for  its  degradation  of  its  users’  traffic.  In  its  ruling  against 
Comcast,4 the  FCC  ordered  the  company  to  stop  blocking  BitTorrent  traffic  and  to 
develop  a  new  set  of  network  management  practices  that  did  not  violate  the  FCC’s 
Broadband  Policy  Statement.5 In  its  letter  of  response  to  the  FCC,  Comcast  con-
firmed  that  it  had  used  DPI  equipment  from  the  Sandvine  Corporation  in  order  to 
identify and block BitTorrent traffic.6 

The second instance surfaced in May 2008, when it was revealed that various re-
gional ISPs had contracted with Knobbed, a company that provided highly targeted 
behavioral  advertising  solutions  using  DPI  equipment.  In  test  deployments  of  this 
technology,  all  of  the  traffic  traveling  over  an  ISP’s  network  was  routed  through  a 
DPI  appliance  which  collected  data  on  specific  users,  including  websites  visited, 
terms  searched  for  and  services  and  applications  used.  This  data  was  then  sent  to 
Knobbed, which in turn, used the data to create detailed user profiles. These profiles 
were  used  to  display  highly  targeted  advertisements,  which  were  dynamically  dis-
played to the user as he or she surfed the Web. 

In May 2008, Representatives Edward Markey (Chairman, Subcommittee on Tele-
communications  and  the  Internet)  and  Joe  Barton  (Ranking  Member,  Senate  Com-
mittee  on  Energy  and  Commerce)  sent  a  letter  to  Knobbed,7 asking  the  company 
to put its pilot tests on hold, pending an investigation into the company’s practices. 
A  coalition  of  15  consumer  advocacy  and  privacy  groups  publicly  voiced  their  sup-
port  for  this  letter  and  urged  the  Congressmen  to  continue  their  investigation  of 
Knobbed and other behavioral advertising companies.8 In June 2008, Public Knowl-
edge  and  Free  Press  released  a  technical  analysis  of  Knobbed’s  behavioral  adver-
tising  system,  authored  by  networking  researcher  Robb  Topolski.9 The  report  re-
vealed  that  Knobbed  and  its  partner  ISPs  repeatedly  violated  the  privacy  of  users, 
with  little  or  no  notification  that  DPI  equipment  was  being  used.  Following  the  re-

1 I  would  like  to  thank  Public  Knowledge’s  Equal  Justice  Works  Fellow  Jef  Pearlman,  Policy 
Analyst  Mehan  Jayasuriya,  and  Law  Clerk  Michael  Weinberg  for  assisting  me  with  this  testi-
mony. 
2 See  Associated  Press  article,  ‘’  Comcast  blocks  some  Internet  traffic″,  (October  19,  2007), 

available at http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/21376597. 

3 See Free Press and Public Knowledge, Formal Complaint of Free Press and Public Knowledge 
Against  Comcast  Corporation  for  Secretly  Degrading  Peer  to  Peer  Applications,  (November  1, 
2007), available at http://www.publicknowledge.org/pdf/fplpklcomcastlcomplaint.pdf [here-
inafter Comcast Complaint]. 

4 See  Federal  Communications  Commission,  Memorandum  Opinion  and  Order  (August  1, 

2008), available at http://hraunfoss.fcc.gov/edocslpublic/attachmatch/FCC–08–183A1.pdf. 

5 See  FCC,  Policy  Statement,  (August  5,  2005),  available  at  http://www.publicknowledge.org/ 

pdf/FCC–05–151A1.pdf. 

6 See  Comcast  Corporation,  Attachment  A:  Comcast  Corporation  Description  of  Current  Net-
work  Management  Practices,  (September  19,  2008),  available  at  http://downloads.comcast.net/ 
docs/AttachmentlAlCurrentlPractices.pdf. 

7 Representative Edward J. Markey and Representative Joe Barton, Letter to Neil Smit, Presi-
dent and CEO, Charter Communications (May 16, 2008), available at http://markey.house.gov/ 
docs/telecomm/letterlcharterlcommlprivacy.pdf. 

8 Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology  et  al.,  Letter  to  Representatives  Markey  and  Barton 

(June 6, 2008), available at http://www.cdt.org/privacy/20080606markeybarton.pdf. 

9 See Public Knowledge and Free Press, Knobbed and Partner ISPs: Wiretapping, Forgery and 
Browser  Hijacking  (June  18,  2008)  available  at  http://www.publicknowledge.org/pdf/nebuad- 
report–20080618.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

lease  of  the  report,  the  House  Committee  on  Energy  and  Commerce  convened  a 
hearing on the topic of DPI, wherein Knobbed CEO Bob Dykes was asked to testify. 
On  August  1,  2008,  the  House  Committee  on  Energy  and  Commerce  followed  up 
with  a  letter  to  33  ISPs  and  software  companies  asking  for  details  regarding  how 
they were using DPI and whether and how they were disclosing those uses to their 
customers.10 As  a  result  of  the  Congressional  scrutiny,  all  of  Knobbed’s  ISP  part-
ners,  including  WOW!  (Wide  Open  West),  CenturyTel,  Charter,  Bresnan  and 
Embarq,  have  decided  to  put  a  hold  on  their  test  deployments  with  Knobbed.  In 
September 2008, Bob Dykes announced that he was leaving Knobbed and following 
his departure, the company announced that it was abandoning its behavioral adver-
tising initiatives, in favor or more traditional advertising technologies. 
II. Deep Packet Inspection 

To  put  it  simply,  Deep  Packet  Inspection  is  the  Internet  equivalent  of  the  postal 
service reading your mail. They might be reading your mail for any number of rea-
sons,  but  the  fact  remains  that  your  mail  is  being  read  by  the  people  whose  job  it 
is to deliver it. 

When  you  use  the  Internet  for  web  browsing,  e-mail  or  any  other  purpose,  the 
data  you  send  and  receive  is  broken  up  into  small  chunks  called  ‘‘packets.’’  These 
packets  are  wrapped  in  envelopes,  which,  much  like  paper  envelopes,  contain  ad-
dresses for both the sender and the receiver—though they contain little information 
about what’s inside. Until recently, when you handed that envelope to your ISP, the 
ISP simply read the address, figured out where to send the envelope in order to get 
it to its destination, and handed it off to the proper mail carrier. 

Now, we understand that more and more ISPs are opening these envelopes, read-
ing  their  contents,  and  keeping  or  using  varying  amounts  of  information  about  the 
communications  inside  for  their  own  purposes.  In  some  cases,  ISPs  are  actually 
passing  copies  of  the  envelopes  on  to  third  parties  who  do  the  actual  reading  and 
use.  In  others,  ISPs  are  using  the  contents  to  change  the  normal  ways  that  the 
Internet works. And for the most part, customers are not aware that their ISPs are 
engaging  in  this  behavior—much  like  if  the  postal  service  were  to  open  your  letter, 
photocopy  it,  hand  that  copy  to  a  third  party  and  then  re-seal  the  letter,  so  that 
you would never know it had even been opened in the first place. 
III. The Privacy Implications of DPI 

It should be clear that the very nature of DPI technology raises grave privacy con-
cerns. An ISP, by necessity, sees every piece of data a user sends or receives on the 
Internet.  In  the  past,  ISPs  had  little  incentive  to  look  at  this  information  and  the 
related privacy concerns provided a strong deterrent against doing so. However, now 
that  technology  is  widely  available  to  make  use  of  and  monetize  this  information, 
companies are exploring the limits of what they can do permissibly. 

When  evaluating  an  implementation  of  DPI  technology,  there  are  three  basic 
questions that must be answered in order to assess both the impact on a user’s pri-
vacy and acceptability of use of the technology in question: 

1. Purpose: What purpose is the collected data being used for? 
2. Collection: How is the data collected and utilized? 
3. Consent: How was affirmative informed consent obtained? 

An  understanding  of  these  questions  can  inform  legislators  and  policymakers  in 
the formation of policies, which will adequately protect users of Internet connections 
and services. The uses for DPI are myriad, and most raise serious privacy concerns, 
but each use should be measured individually against a comprehensive privacy pol-
icy. 

It is also important to note that there are two parties to any Internet communica-
tion.  In  almost  all  cases,  the  party  on  the  other  end  of  a  user’s  line  will  have  no 
meaningful ability at all to know what kind of monitoring is being employed by that 
user’s  ISP  or  what  is  being  done  with  the  collected  data,  and  will  have  no  oppor-
tunity  at  all  to  give  or  to  deny  consent.  For  example,  if  I  send  you  an  e-mail  and 
my ISP is using DPI to read the contents of my e-mails, your privacy has just been 
violated without your knowledge or consent. Any comprehensive privacy policy that 
addresses  technologies  like  DPI  must  take  into  account  not  only  the  privacy  rights 

10 See  John  D.  Dingell  (Chairman,  Senate  Committee  on  Energy  and  Commerce),  Joe  Barton 
(Ranking Member, Senate Committee on Energy and Commerce), Edward J. Markey (Chairman, 
Subcommittee  on  Telecommunications  and  the  Internet),  Cliff  Stearns  (Ranking  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Telecommunications  and  the  Internet),  Letter  to  ISPs  (Aug.  1,  2008),  available  at 
http://markey.house.gov/docs/telecomm/letterldpil33lcompanies.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

of  an  ISP’s  customers,  but  also  those  of  anyone  who  communicates  with  these  cus-
tomers. 
A. Purpose 

Given  DPI’s  potential  to  be  used  as  an  intrusive  tool,  we  must  first  ask  why  the 
user’s  traffic  is  being  collected  or  analyzed  at  all.  Is  the  use  of  DPI  integral  to  the 
functioning of the network or is the technology simply being used to provide the ISP 
with  an  additional  revenue  stream?  Does  the  technology  in  question  primarily  ben-
efit the ISP’s bottom line, or does it give direct benefits to the customer’s use of the 
Internet?  Is  it  used  to  protect  users  or  the  integrity  of  the  network,  or  simply  to 
offer new or improved additional services? 

Not  all  uses  of  DPI  are  inherently  problematic.  The  first  widespread  uses  of  DPI 
were for security purposes: to stop malicious programs like viruses and worms from 
passing  from  one  infected  computer  to  another  over  the  Internet.  However,  as  seen 
in  the  recent  complaint  and  decision  against  Comcast  at  the  Federal  Communica-
tions Commission (FCC), DPI can also be used to engage in impermissible, discrimi-
natory  network  management  practices.  Taken  to  an  extreme,  we  can  even  imagine 
a  future  where  DPI  is  used  to  record  and  disseminate  every  single  move  a  user 
makes  on  the  Internet—from  web  browsing,  e-mail  and  instant  messaging  to  VoIP 
phone calls and video chats—to the ISP’s own business advantage. 

Understanding the purpose of DPI use is the first step to understanding whether 

that use will violate a user’s expectations of privacy. 
B. Collection 

After  we  understand  the  purpose  of  a  particular  use  of  DPI,  we  can  analyze  how 
the data is collected and used toward that purpose. Is the user’s data being collected 
by the ISP for its own use, or is it being passed to a third party with no connection 
to  the  user?  Is  all  of  the  user’s  data  collected,  or  a  smaller  subset  of  the  data?  Is 
the  amount  collected  narrowly  tailored  to  achieve  the  stated  purpose,  or  broader 
than  necessary,  or  is  the  amount  of  data  actually  used  smaller  than  that  collected? 
It  is  important  to  note  here  that  we  should  evaluate  both  the  amount  of  data 
which  reaches  the  party  using  it,  and  the  amount  of  that  data  which  is  used.  This 
is  because  additional  data  that  is  sent  to  a  third  party  provides  more  opportunity 
for  abuse  of  user  privacy—even  if  that  third  party  later  chose  to  discard  some  of 
the  more  personal  information.  For  instance,  even  though  companies  like  Knobbed 
may  choose  to  ignore  the  personal  medical  records  or  e-mails  of  its  partner’s  cus-
tomers, they were provided the data to do exactly that. This problem is compounded 
by  the  fact  that  an  ISP  or  partner  must  engage  in  DPI  to  even  discover  what  type 
of data is being transmitted, thereby possibly violating the user’s privacy before any 
decision is made regarding what is to be done with the data. 

It is also necessary to identify the ways in which the collected data might be tied 
to  the  user’s  actual  identity.  Is  the  data  obtained  using  DPI  explicitly  tied  to  data 
obtained  through  other  means—for  example,  the  ISP’s  billing  information,  demo-
graphic  information,  or  personal  information  stored  on  a  third-party  website?  Can 
the  collected  data  be  later  aggregated  with  this  type  of  information?  Will  the  data 
itself  contain  personally  identifying  information  (PII),  such  as  names,  addresses, 
and  credit  card  information  submitted  to  websites?  These  questions  are  important 
because  if  the  data  in  question  contains  PII  or  if  it  is  later  connected  with  other 
user data, the privacy implications are multiplied. 

Implicit  in  the  data  collection  question  are  also  questions  about  data  storage.  Is 
the  collected  data  kept  by  the  party  using  it?  If  so,  for  how  long?  Is  it  kept  in  its 
original,  complete  form,  or  in  some  type  of  summary?  Is  any  PII  kept  with  the 
stored data? 

Understanding  what  and  how  data  is  collected  and  how  well  that  comports  with 
the stated purpose of the collection is necessary to evaluating whether the collection 
will violate users’ privacy expectations. 
C. Consent 

No  inspection  of  a  user’s  data  will  be  acceptable  without  that  user’s  affirmative, 
informed  consent  or  law  enforcement  obligations.  To  ensure  this  is  obtained,  we 
must  evaluate  both  how  users  are  notified  of  the  ways  in  which  their  ISP  and  its 
partners intend to use DPI, and the method by which those users affirmatively con-
sent  (or  decline  to  consent)  to  those  uses.  To  do  this,  we  must  ensure  that  before 
a  user’s  data  is  inspected,  the  user  actually  receives  complete,  useful  information, 
and that the user knowingly and affirmatively assents to the stated uses. 

Are  the  answers  to  the  above  questions  about  purpose  and  collection  accessible 
for users, and complete in the information they divulge? If any third parties are in-
volved in the monitoring, are their identities provided for the user? Are the answers 
written so that the average user can make sense of them? Are the policies in ques-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

tion  detailed  in  a  place  and  manner  that  ensures  that  the  user  is  likely  to  read 
them?  Is  the  user  actively  notified  of  the  presence  of  and  changes  to  policies  and 
monitoring activities, or are changes made to web pages and written into the Terms 
of Service—without any notification to the user? Without accurate and easily under-
standable  information  that  a  user  is  actually  aware  of,  that  user  cannot  make  in-
formed choices about how best to manage his or her privacy online. 

Finally,  what  is  the  process  by  which  users  agree  (or  decline  to  agree)  to  the  use 
of these technologies? Are they subject to DPI before they receive meaningful notice 
of its use, or is the user required to take an affirmative action before his or her data 
is recorded or analyzed? Is the information and the action specific to the monitoring 
activities,  or  is  it  hidden  in  a  larger  ‘‘Acceptable  Use  Policy,’’  ‘‘End  User  License 
Agreement,’’  or  other  document?  Does  the  user  have  the  meaningful  ability  to 
change his or her choice later? Is the user actively offered a periodic chance to with-
draw  consent,  or  is  he  or  she  only  asked  once?  And  is  the  option  not  to  consent  a 
real one, without crippling or disabling of the user’s service as the only alternative? 
Without  meaningful,  informed,  affirmative  consent  on  the  part  of  the  user,  per-
sonal  data  should  not  be  used  for  any  purpose  that  is  not  necessary  to  providing 
basic Internet service. 
IV. ISP Disclosures 

In  response  to  Chairman  Dingell  and  Ranking  Member  Barton’s  letter,  33  ISPs 
and  software  companies  described  whether  and  how  they  were  using  DPI  and 
whether  and  how  they  were  disclosing  those  uses  to  their  customers.11 These  re-
sponses  are  helpful  in  understanding  how,  to  date,  the  above  three  questions  have 
been answered unsatisfactorily. 

Carriers  that  responded  to  the  letter  fell  into  two  basic  camps.  The  first  group 
of  ISPs  did  not  employ  Knobbed’s  services  and  did  not  use  any  similar  DPI  equip-
ment. These ISPs generally had not deployed any technologies that could track indi-
vidual  users’  browsing  habits  or  correlate  advertising  information  with  personal  in-
formation possessed by the ISP.12 

The second camp contained those ISPs who performed trials of or deployed third- 
party  DPI-based  behavioral  advertising  systems.13 Importantly,  these  ISPs  gen-
erally  did  not  inspect  user  data  themselves,  but  passed  it  off  to  their  partners  for 
analysis.  According  to  these  ISPs,  they  were  assured  that  measures  were  in  place 
to  ensure  that  those  partners  did  not  retain  medical  information,  personal  data,  e- 
mails, or other types of especially sensitive data.14 Also, all of these ISPs stated that 
they  and  Knobbed  did  not  tie  the  tracked  Internet  data  to  personal  customer  data 
already known to the ISP (billing information, etc.).15 

However,  as  a  technical  matter,  the  personal  data  embedded  in  a  user’s  Internet 
communications was handed off to the ISP’s partners, when the ISP itself is actually 
responsible  for  safeguarding  its  users  data.  In  some  cases,  the  identity  of  the  part-
ner  was  not  divulged  to  the  user.  These  partners  had  no  direct  interactions  with 
the user, meaning that final control of what data was used and how rested not with 
the  user  or  even  the  ISP,  but  with  this  third  party.  To  return  to  the  postal  service 
analogy,  it  is  as  if  the  ISPs  photocopied  users’  letters  and  handed  these  copies  to 
third parties, who agreed to only write down which commercial products were men-
tioned  in  the  letters,  and  not  anything  else  that  someone  might  consider  sensitive. 
However,  the  decision  as  to  what,  exactly,  should  be  considered  ‘sensitive,’  is  not 
made by the user but rather, by this third-party company. 

Customer notification and consent varied from ISP to ISP, but there were signifi-
cant  trends.  ISPs  generally  posted  modified  terms  of  service  and  often  updated  the 
‘Frequently  Asked  Questions’  section  on  their  websites,  but  usually  declined  to  di-
rectly contact users or call attention to the significance of the new service. Knology, 
for  instance,  updated  their  Customer  Service  Agreement  on  their  website,  which  is 
presented  to  new  users,  but  apparently  made  no  other  attempt  to  draw  attention 
to the change.16 

The  level  of  detail  in  the  disclosures  also  fell  far  short  of  the  minimum  that  is 
necessary  for  customers  to  make  an  informed  decision.  For  example,  CenturyTel 
sent  an  e-mail  informing  users  only  that  it  had  ‘‘updated  its  Privacy  Policy  con-

11 All 33 response letters are available at the House Energy and Commerce Committee’s Sub-
committee  on  Telecommunications  and  the  Internet  website  at  http://energycommerce.house 
.gov/Pressl110/080108.ResponsesDataCollectionLetter.shtml. 

12 See, e.g., Response Letters of AT&T, Verizon, and Time-Warner. 
13 See,  e.g.,  Response  Letters  of  WOW!,  Charter  Communications,  Knology,  and  CenturyTel. 
14 See Response Letter of Charter Communications 2. 
15 See Response Letter of Knology 1. 
16 See Response Letter of Knology 2. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

cerning  Internet  Access  Services’’  and  provided  a  web  link  to  the  updated  policy.17 
The policy in question stated only: 

Online Advertising and Third-party Ad Servers. 
CenturyTel partners with a third party to deliver or facilitate delivery of adver-
tisements  to  our  users  while  they  are  surfing  the  Web.  This  delivery  of  adver-
tisements  may  be  facilitated  by  the  serving  of  ad  tags  outside  the  publisher’s 
existing  HTML  code.  These  advertisements  will  be  based  on  those  users’  anony-
mous  surfing  behavior  while  they  are  online.  This  anonymous  information  will 
not  include  those  users’  names,  e-mail  addresses,  telephone  number,  or  any 
other personally identifiable information. By opting out, you will continue to re-
ceive  advertisements  as  normal;  except  these  advertisements  will  be  less  rel-
evant  and  less  useful  to  you.  If  you  would  like  to  opt  out,  click  here  or  visit 
http://www.nebuad.com/privacy/servicesPrivacy.php.18 
A later letter sent out by CenturyTel stated the following: 

CenturyTel continually looks for ways to improve your overall online experience. 
In  that  regard,  we  have  enhanced  our  High-Speed  Internet  service  by  working 
with  partners  to  provide  targeted,  online  advertising  for  your  convenience  and 
benefit. Targeted, online advertising minimizes irrelevant or unwanted ads that 
clutter your web pages. If you do not wish to receive targeted, online advertise-
ments,  or  if  you  would  simply  like  more  information  about  CenturyTel’s  use  of 
online advertising, third-party ad servers and the measures you can take to pro-
tect  your  privacy,  please  review  our  Privacy  Policy  by  visiting  http:// 
www.centurytel.com/Pages/PrivacyPolicy/#adv.19 

No  mention  is  made  at  all  of  providing  actual  user  data  (let  alone  all  of  a  user’s 
packets) to third parties. Only a single mention of ads being ‘‘based on those users’ 
anonymous  surfing  behavior’’  is  offered  in  the  first  notice,  and  the  second  presents 
the  service  only  as  enhanced,  ‘‘targeted  advertising  for  your  convenience  and  ben-
efit’’  without  mention  of  the  methods  involved  to  deliver  said  advertisements.  It’s 
worth  noting  that  these  examples  are  not  unique  to  CenturyTel  or  even  unusual; 
rather, they are indicative of the level of detail provided in many ISP notices. Such 
notices do not make clear to the user what is actually being done with the data they 
send and receive over the Internet. None of the ISPs appears to have required that 
a user take any affirmative action at all before having their data handed wholesale 
to a third party. Inaction or failure to read the notice was simply treated as an ‘opt- 
in’. 

It is important to note that nearly every ISP that responded mentioned that they 
run their own websites, and use traditional tracking methods such as cookies to ob-
serve  and  record  the  behavior  of  their  customers  on  their  sites,  much  like  Google, 
Yahoo,  Microsoft,  and  many  other  web  service  providers  do.  Likewise,  many  ISPs 
also  use  what  is  called  a  ‘‘DNS  redirect,’’  which,  rather  than  returning  an  error  to 
a  user’s  web  browser  when  he  or  she  types  in  an  incorrect  web  address,  redirects 
the  user  to  another  web  page  which  may  have  related  suggestions,  advertisements, 
or other information. 

These  non-DPI  practices  have  privacy  implications  that  overlap  with  the  ones 
being discussed today, but which are different in kind and scope. It is the difference 
between you writing down what I tell you on the phone and my phone company re-
cording  my  conversation  with  you  because  unlike  my  phone  company,  you  cannot 
record  what  I’ve  said  on  my  phone  calls  to  other  people.  Nonetheless,  the  privacy 
practices  of  and  personal  information  available  to  application  providers  raise  their 
own  serious  questions  of  legal  policy,  and  any  regulatory  regime  we  consider  must 
be  comprehensive  and  attempt  to  ensure  the  protection  of  Internet  users  against 
privacy invasions from all such sources. 
V. Current Law 

Independent  analysis  by  the  Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology  suggests  that 
although  it  is  far  from  clear,  despite  ISP  claims,20 past  experiments  with  DPI  and 
behavioral advertising of the type engaged in by Knobbed may run afoul of existing 
law.  Critically,  however,  some  of  the  laws  in  question  might  not  apply  if  the  ISP 

17 Response Letter of CenturyTel 3. 18 Id. 3 (emphasis added). 
18 Id. 3. 
19 Id. 3–4. 
20 See  Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology,  An  Overview  of  the  Federal  Wiretap  Act,  Elec-
tronic  Communications  Privacy  Act,  and  State  Two-Party  Consent  Laws  of  Relevance  to  the 
Knobbed  System  and  Other  Uses  of  Internet  Traffic  Content  from  ISPs  for  Behavioral  Adver-
tising,  (July  8,  2008),  available  at  http://www.cdt.org/privacy/20080708ISPtraffic.pdf  [herein-
after CDT Behavioral Advertising Overview]. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

engaged  in  this  behavior  internally,  instead  of  delegating  responsibility  to  a  third 
party.21 Thus, an ISP might legally be able to read and analyze all of its customers’ 
communications as long as it does so itself—hardly an improvement in privacy. 

It is extremely important to note that without apparent exception, every ISP that 
responded  to  Chairman  Markey’s  letter  concluded  that  both  the  tracking  and  opt- 
out  mechanism  were  legal,  or  at  the  very  least,  were  ‘‘not  unlawful  or  impermis-
sible.’’ 22 One  ISP  even  went  so  far  as  to  claim  that  it  ‘‘offered  customers  easy-to- 
use  opt-out  mechanisms  as  recommended  by  the  FTC.’’ 23 However,  even  the  ‘‘opt- 
out’’  method  was  questionable,  as  the  act  of  opting  out  did  not  stop  the  delivery  to 
and monitoring by the third-party partner but only the presentation of targeted ads 
and stored profiles.24 

Yet  to  date,  no  enforcement  actions  have  been  taken  against  a  practice  that  is  of 
significant  concern  to  citizens  and  lawmakers  alike.  Regardless  of  whether  or  not 
the  actions  taken  by  ISPs  are  technically  legal,  the  existing  legal  regime  is  clearly 
not  effective  at  preventing  such  privacy  violations.  And  if  ISPs  believe  they  can  le-
gally and profitably engage in this behavior with only a minimal effort made to no-
tify and protect users, they will continue to do so. 

To  the  credit  of  the  ISPs  here  today,  several  providers  have  made  commitments 
to  ensuring  that  there  is  transparency,  affirmative  consent,  and  ongoing  control  by 
customers.  For  example,  Time-Warner’s  testimony  suggests  control,  transparency, 
disclosure,  and  safeguarding  personal  information  as  principles  on  which  to  base  a 
privacy framework. AT&T states that the company will not engage in behavioral ad-
vertising  without  affirmative,  advance  action  by  the  consumer  that  is  based  on  a 
clear explanation of how that information will be used. But while these are laudable 
principles  and  we  applaud  the  carriers  here  today  for  their  stated  commitment  to 
customer  privacy,  promises  by  individual  ISPs  are  not  enough  and  do  not  obviate 
the need for a comprehensive governmental policy. 

Part of the reason for the current lack of enforcement can be traced to ambiguity 
in  the  FCC’s  authority  to  protect  the  privacy  of  Internet  users,  despite  the  FCC’s 
time-honored role in protecting the privacy of communications as a whole. Congress 
has  long  recognized  that  providers  of  communications  services  occupy  an  especially 
sensitive position in society. As data conduits, communications services are uniquely 
positioned  to  track  customers  and  collect  information  about  their  daily  lives.  The 
Communications  Act,  which  created  the  FCC,  contains  provisions  designed  to  pro-
tect the privacy of telephone and cable customers. But those same protections have 
yet to be unambiguously extended to Internet customers. As a result, customers can-
not  be  confident  that  their  sensitive  information  is  protected  from  unwanted  intru-
sion. In a society where Internet services are increasingly used to transmit personal 
and sensitive information, this is clearly problematic. 

Section  222  of  the  Communications  Act  applies  to  the  privacy  of  customer  infor-
mation  collected  by  common  carriers.25 The  statute  recognizes  that  ‘‘individually 
identifiable consumer proprietary network information’’ is created by, and critical to 
the functioning of, telecommunications services.26 However, the statute strictly lim-
its the use of that information to applications that handle tasks like billing and the 
maintenance  of  network  integrity.27 Carriers  are  allowed  to  provide  aggregate  con-
sumer information to third parties, but this information must have both ‘‘individual 
customer  identities  and  characteristics’’  removed.28 Viewed  holistically,  this  section 
manifests  a  Congressional  understanding  that  common  carriers  have  access  to  sen-
sitive  personal  information,  and  that  common  carriers  have  legitimate  reasons  to 
use  that  data.  However,  this  understanding  is  balanced  by  strict  prohibitions 
against any non-essential use or the disclosure of sensitive data. 

21 See id. at 6–9. 
22 Response Letter of CenturyTel 2–3 (Aug. 7, 2008). Cable One does describe their disclosures 
in  their  Acceptable  Use  Policies  as  ‘‘opt-in’’  because  the  user  must  check  and  acceptance  box, 
but  this  does  not  qualify  as  either  an  affirmative  step  specific  to  monitoring  or  a  meaningful 
opportunity  to  deny  consent,  because  the  alternative  is  no  Internet  service  at  all.  See  Response 
Letter of Cable One 3 (Aug. 8, 2008). 

23 Response Letter of Charter Communications 2 (Aug. 8, 2008) (emphasis added). 
24 Ryan  Singel,  Congressmen  Ask  Charter  to  Freeze  Web  Profiling  Plan,  Threat  Level  from 
Wired.com (May 16, 2008). See also Ryan Singel, Can Charter Broadband Customers Really Opt- 
Out of Spying? Maybe Not, Wired (May 16, 2008). 

25 47 U.S.C. § 222. 
26 See 47 U.S.C. § 222(c)(1). 
27 See 47 U.S.C. § 222(d). 
28 See 47 U.S.C. § 222(c)(3), (h)(2). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Although  many  common  carriers  provide  Internet  services  to  consumers,29 such 
Internet  services  are  not  covered  under  Section  222.30 As  a  result,  plain  old  tele-
phone  customers  can  be  confident  that  sensitive  information  contained  in  their 
phone records will be kept confidential, but they cannot enjoy the same level of con-
fidence  when  it  comes  to  sensitive  information  that  Verizon  might  compile  using 
their DSL Internet activity. 

Section 631 of the Communications Act also marks an attempt by Congress to pro-
tect  the  privacy  of  consumers,  this  time  from  cable  system  operators.  Again,  the 
statute  recognizes  the  fact  that  operators  will  need  to  collect  and  use  some  person-
ally identifiable information in order to operate their systems. However, these oper-
ators  are  required  to  obtain  written  permission  from  consumers  in  order  to  collect 
any  personally  identifiable  information  that  is  not  crucial  to  the  operation  of  the 
system.31 Additionally,  operators  are  required  to  obtain  prior  written  or  electronic 
consent before disclosing any personally identifiable information.32 The statute does 
not  impose  these  same  protections  on  aggregate  data  that  does  not  identify  a  par-
ticular  customer,33 and  allows  an  operator  to  disclose  names  and  addresses  of  sub-
scribers as long as that information is not tied to use or transactional information.34 
As  with  Section  222,  Section  631  specifically  protects  sensitive  information  that 
network  operators  are  uniquely  positioned  to  collect.  However,  unlike  Section  222, 
which  applies  to  phone  customers  but  not  Internet  service  customers,  Section  631 
is  written  to  apply  to  both  cable  television  subscribers  and  cable  Internet  sub-
scribers.35 

Unfortunately, not all customers access the Internet by way of a cable system. In 
addition  to  unprotected  DSL  service,  customers  can  access  the  Internet  via  a  fiber 
optic  network,  a  satellite  based  service,  or  by  using  one  of  many  wireless  Internet 
standards. Instead of relying on old categories that may protect some (but certainly 
not  all)  consumers,  Congress  must  recognize  that  all  Internet  service  providers 
share  the  same  privileged  position  of  access  to  their  users’  personal  data.  As  a  re-
sult, Congress should collectively protect customers with legislation that specifically 
addresses  all  Internet  service  providers,  rather  than  legislation  that  effectively 
forces customers to access the Internet via a single, protected pathway. 

The time has come for a comprehensive regulatory structure that will ensure that 
the  privacy  rights  of  all  Internet  users  are  protected,  and  one  that,  like  the  Tele-
communications Act of 1996, ‘‘expands very important privacy protections to individ-
uals in their relationships with these very large companies.’’ 36 
VI. Fixing the Law 

Given the power of the technology and the scope of possible uses, it is critical that 
we  establish  industry  guidelines  and  legal  protections  for  users.  And  while  the  use 
of  personal  data  by  application  providers  is  not  the  focus  of  our  discussion  today, 
as discussed above, any solution should strive to be comprehensive in scope and en-
sure  that  the  basic  principles  of  privacy  protection  are  applied  across  the  entire 
Internet  ecosystem.  These  protections  should  meet  three  major  goals  that  parallel 
the privacy inquiries described above: 

can be consistent with consumers’ privacy expectations. 

• They  must  ensure  that  the  purpose  of  the  use  of  customer  data  is  one  which 
• They  must  ensure  that  the  amount  and  type  of  data  collected  is  narrowly  tai-
lored to the proposed use, and that the data is not kept or disseminated to third 
parties past what is necessary to that use. 
• They must ensure that customers have access to and actually receive adequate 
information  about  the  proposed  use,  and  have  affirmatively  and  actively  con-
sented to any practices which could violate customers’ expectations of privacy.37 

(2005). 

29 See, e.g., Verizon, http://www.verizon.com/. 
30 See National Cable & Telecommunications Assn. v. Brand X Internet Services, 545 U.S. 967 

31 See 47 U.S.C. § 551(b). 
32 See 47 U.S.C. § 551(c)(1). 
33 See 47 U.S.C. § 551(a)(2)(A). 
34 See 47 U.S.C. § 551(c)(2). 
35 See 47 U.S.C. § 551(a)(2)(C)(ii). 
36 Statement of Congressman Edward Markey, 142 Cong. Rec. H1145–06 (Feb. 1, 1996). 
37 The FCC has already presented us with an example of how Commission action and ISP dis-
closures  can  be  used  to  help  protect  Internet  users  from  privacy  invasions  and  impermissible 
network  management  practices.  In  its  order  finding  that  Comcast’s  interference  with  customer 
traffic  was  not  reasonable  network  management,  the  Commission  ordered  Comcast  to  fully  dis-
close  the  details  of  its  past  and  planned  practices,  including  use  of  DPI.  See  Federal  Commu-
Continued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

In  order  to  achieve  these  goals,  the  Committee  should  seek  to  pass  legislation  to 
encapsulate  these  requirements  and  to  make  it  clear  that  the  FCC  has  the  power 
to  enforce  them.  As  the  Commission  observed  in  1998,  ‘‘The  [Communications  Act] 
recognizes that customers must be able to control information they view as sensitive 
and  personal  from  use,  disclosure,  and  access  by  carriers.’’ 38 The  Committee  and 
Congress need only make it clear that Internet user privacy is another area of com-
munications where the Commission is empowered to protect consumer privacy. 
VII. Conclusion 

I would like to thank the Committee again for giving me the opportunity to testify 
today.  Public  Knowledge  is  eager  to  work  with  the  Committee  to  craft  comprehen-
sive privacy legislation that will protect Internet users. I look forward to your ques-
tions. 

Senator DORGAN. Ms. Sohn, thank you for your testimony. 
Why  do  we  not  start  with  where  you  concluded  on  deep  packet 
inspection? I know that our colleagues in the House had sent ques-
tionnaires to Internet service providers and have received some re-
sponses.  How  extensive  do  you  think  is  this  tactic  of  deep  packet 
inspection? 

Ms.  SOHN.  Well,  it  was  more  extensive  than  it  is  now.  Because 
of  the  scrutiny  over  on  the  House  side  and  also  over  here,  several 
of  the  ISPs  that  were  using  deep  packet  inspection  have  ceased 
using  deep  packet  inspection.  There  was  such  an  outcry.  However, 
some are still using deep packet inspection. 

And  as  I  said  before,  a  number  of  those—actually  all  of  the  pro-
viders that were using deep packet inspection who responded to the 
House  said  that  they  believed  that  they  were  fully  acting  within 
the law and that what they did to protect consumers was adequate. 
And speaking to some of the folks—I will let them speak for them-
selves—on  my  right,  I  know  some  of  them  are  considering  using 
DPI  as  well,  albeit  with  the  protections  that  they  have  outlined 
today. 

Senator DORGAN. Is there a beneficial use of deep packet inspec-
tion, for example, attempting to determine who is out there that is 
providing  viruses?  So  is  deep  packet  inspection  a  process  that  in 
some cases can be beneficial? 

Ms.  SOHN.  Absolutely.  Public  Knowledge  has  been  saying  in  the 
7 years of its existence, that you do not outlaw technology. You out-
law  bad  uses  of  technology,  and  DPI,  as  you  stated,  can  be  used 
for lawful and very beneficial purposes. 

Senator DORGAN. But the testimony and knowledge we have, for 
example, of NebuAd and others says that the purpose of deep pack-
et  inspection  is  to  track  people’s  behavior  in  a  wide  range  of  areas 
and  then  profile  and  do  targeted  advertising  to  that  profile,  which 
is done, I assume, largely without the knowledge of the user, which 
is very troublesome. 

Ms.  Attwood,  you  indicated  to  me  that  the  fact  that  the  Senate 
and  the  House  are  beginning  to  evaluate  these  things  was  helpful 
to  your  company  because  these  are  relatively  new  issues  and  it 

nications  Commission,  Memorandum  Opinion  and  Order  ¶ 54–56  (August  1,  2008),  available  at 
http://hraunfoss.fcc.gov/edocslpublic/attachmatch/FCC–08–183A1.pdf.  Given  the  authority, 
the Commission could make this type of disclosure an industry-wide baseline to ensure that cus-
tomer’s  decisions  about  granting  consent  are  based  on  good,  complete  information  backed  the 
force of law. 

38 Federal Communications Commission, Common Carrier News Release (Feb. 19, 1998), avail-
able  at  http://www.fcc.gov/Bureaus/CommonlCarrier/NewslReleases/1998/nrcc8019.html 
(clarifying permissible uses of Customer Proprietary Network Information). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

really caused your company to be thinking what kind of policies do 
we  employ,  how  do  we  go  through  this  and  develop  policies  inter-
nally. And I think that is commendable. 

The  question  I  think  for  the  three  providers  here  is  what  kind 
of information do you collect at this point. What kind of movements 
do you track and for what purpose? 

Ms. ATTWOOD. Well, it is a great question. I guess I would elabo-

rate. Here we are talking about behavioral advertising. 

Senator DORGAN. Right. 
Ms.  ATTWOOD.  And  in  that  context,  we  are  not  engaged  in  that 
practice  today.  And  we  commend  you  and  this  Committee  and  the 
attention  and  the  effort  to  look  at  the  way  in  which  collection  of 
material  has  affected  or  prompted  our  consumers  to  identify  what 
they are concerned about. 

That  allows  us  to  actually  look  as  we  enter  into  these  phases  to 
say can we use privacy as a design element. Rather than as a regu-
latory  requirement  or  as  something  after  the  fact  that  we  have  to 
look at, let us look and say our products and services—privacy will 
be by design. And that is what this dialogue allows us to do. It al-
lows  us  to  as  an  industry  galvanize  around  how  we  can  construct 
the  right  framework  so  that  we  can  bring  the  benefits  of  both  the 
advantages  of  an  advertising-supported  model,  which  is  really  an 
innovation  in  the  Internet  area,  as  well  as  the  capabilities  of  pro-
tecting the privacy of our customers. 

So  we  have  millions  of  customers,  and  therefore  we  have  lots  of 
information  that  we  use  to  improve  the  services  and  products  of 
our customers. There is a lot of value that can be created and inno-
vation  that  can  be  created  in  offering  additional  targeted  adver-
tising, as well as additional value propositions to the customer. We 
think  that  is  something  today  that  has  proved  itself,  whether  it  is 
affinity cards or whether it is in some things that you already see. 
Those  are  areas  where  we  are  hopeful  we  can  help  innovate,  as 
long as we consider privacy by design. 

Senator  DORGAN.  As  a  consumer  and  an  Internet  user,  I  see  the 
value of targeted advertising because if I am on the Internet want-
ing perhaps buy a pair of shoes and then I see targeted advertising 
coming at me advertising certain kinds of shoes, perhaps even that 
same  brand,  I  understand  that  someone  saw  I  was  looking  at 
shoes,  and  so  they  were  trying  to  provide  additional  advertising 
about  shoes.  In  many  ways  that  is  useful,  perhaps  in  some  cases 
annoying, but in many other cases useful. 

But  the  other  side  of  this  is  that  an  Internet  service  provider 
would  have  a  substantial  body  of  knowledge.  Let  us  assume  that 
my two colleagues, Senator Klobuchar and Senator Thune, are cus-
tomers of the same provider. You would have a substantial amount 
of information about each of them, what they have done, what their 
travels have been on the Internet, where they have visited, and so 
on.  And  that  could  have  enormous  financial  value  to  a  company. 
And  someone  comes  to  your  company  and  says,  you  know  what? 
That information you are sitting on has great, great value. We will 
pay  a  lot  of  money  for  it.  So  that  is  where  the  advertising  model 
on the Internet confronts the issue of privacy that is very, very im-
portant. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

So I appreciate the testimony today. I think all three of you have 
said  that  your  companies  have  had  to  sink  their  teeth  into  this 
question  of  how  do  you  deal  with  the  privacy  issue.  You  have  all 
talked, I think, about the opt-in strategy doing so in a manner that 
has a customer that is fully informed. 

I  have  seen  a  number  of  opt-in  strategies  that  I  think,  Mr. 
Tauke, you mentioned. People do not have the foggiest idea wheth-
er  they  have  opted  in  or  opted  out.  They  have  simply  pushed  the 
‘‘OK’’ button with the cursor, and so there they are. 

This  is  a  really  interesting  set  of  issues.  I  did  indicate  that  if 
somebody  followed  you  into  a  mall  with  a  clipboard  and  traced  ev-
erything  you  not  just  bought  or  store  you  visited,  but  every  single 
item you looked at, you have great angst about that. Who on earth 
is doing this? And yet, that potential exists. And so that is why we 
have  to  try  to  deal  with  this  tension  between  constructive  adver-
tising models on the Internet and the right to privacy. 

Senator Klobuchar is next. 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you  very  much,  Chairman  Dorgan. 

Thank you for having this hearing. Thank you to our witnesses. 

At the last hearing on this, I expressed my views that Americans 
have  a  love-hate  relationship  with  advertising  on  the  Internet.  We 
want to see some of it, and then some of it we do not want. 

I  made  the  mistake,  Mr.  Chair,  of  using  the  example  at  the  last 
hearing  of  how  I  liked  to  see  ads  pop  up  for  deals  on  clothes,  but 
I do not like it when my daughter who is 13 sees ads for American 
Girls.  And  as  a  result,  I  would  just  like  the  record  to  reflect,  I  got 
several letters from defenders of American Girl dolls. It was in the 
Los Angeles Times—my quote. And I just want the record to reflect 
that  I  have  nothing  against  the  American  Girl  dolls,  including 
Kirsten,  Molly,  Kaya,  and  Kit  Kittredge,  which  movie  I  just  saw. 
So if you could just make that clear. 

Senator DORGAN. Well, the permanent record will reflect—— 
[Laughter.] 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you very much. 
I actually just had some questions looking at your testimony and 
thinking  about  what  we  talked  about  last  time.  You  know  how 
when you have your credit record, you are able to go back and clear 
it  up  and  see  what  information  is  on  there.  Do  you  think  you 
should  have  the  same  ability  to  do  that  as  a  consumer  with  any 
information that might be on there on your shopping record or the 
information  on  you  on  the  Internet?  I  do  not  know  who  wants  to 
take that. 

Ms.  ATTWOOD.  I  am  happy  to  address  that.  I  think  that  is  one 
of  the  issues  that  would  be  interesting  to  develop,  the  question  of 
whether  the  customer  not  only  can  control  the  information  that  is 
collected,  but  also  can  identify  and  see  what  they  look  like  online. 
And even more to your point—and I do not want letters either, al-
though I do not think I would get them from American Girl. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  These  were  just  consumers  for  American 

Girl, not the company. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Ms. ATTWOOD. Maybe ultimately down the line you would be able 
to  have  some  flexibility  in  identifying  what  advertisements  you 
want  to  see  and  what  you  do  not  want  to  see.  So  those  could  be 
age-specific. Those could be related to your household, a particular 
interest in your household. 

So the concept of customer control, the concept of using the capa-
bilities and enhancements of the technology to help customize that 
experience  is  something  of  an  exciting  prospect  so  long  as  we  pro-
tect and really embrace the notion of privacy. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Mr. Stern? 
Mr. STERN. Thank you, Senator. 
If  I  may  just  add,  not  only  does  customer  consent  allow  the  con-
sumer  to  opt  in,  if  they  want  to  have  online  advertising  be  tar-
geted, but they can also opt out. And that gives them a unique abil-
ity  to  do  something  that  they  cannot  do  with  their  credit  report, 
which is to wipe the slate clean. And so we think that that is actu-
ally an important part of this, giving customers the ability to make 
a decision and later change their mind. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Very  good.  And  the  technology  is  available 

to do that? 

Mr. STERN. Yes, it is. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. If we were to put together some legislation 
at  some  point—and  I  know  all  three  of  you  would  rather  have  it 
be self-regulating, but if Federal privacy regulation is considered in 
Congress, what would you think the key would be to this potential 
legislation?  What  do  you  think  should  be  in  that?  Are  there  any 
models  you  would  look  at  like  the  European  data  privacy  law,  or 
what would you look at to do that? Mr. Tauke? 

Mr. TAUKE. Well, Senator, first of all, you are right. At this junc-
ture, we are not prepared to embrace legislation. We actually think 
that there are some models on the books already that could be use-
ful.  I  mentioned  in  my  testimony  the  advertising  industry’s  model 
where the FTC is the enforcing agency. 

One  of  the  reasons  why  we  are  a  little  unsure  about  legislation 
at this juncture is because this technology is developing so rapidly, 
and  there  are  different  technologies  that  are  being  used  to  do  dif-
ferent  things.  As  I  think  all  of  us  have  alluded  to  in  one  way  or 
another,  the  technology  is  not  in  and  of  itself  bad.  The  technology 
can  do  terrific  things  in  order  to  enhance  online  experiences.  It  is 
how it is handled and what the consumer role is. 

So having said that, with legislation I believe the notion of mean-
ingful  consent  and  the  consumer  in  charge  of  their  online  experi-
ence are the two key elements. Exactly how that translates into the 
technology  of  today  and  the  technology  and  practices  of  tomorrow 
is  a  little  uncertain  yet.  That  is  why  I  think  if  the  industry  could, 
in a sense, help establish some best practices ourselves, try to keep 
up to date with that stuff, get all the players involved, because the 
consumer  does  not  care  who  is  tracking—you  know,  it  is  the  same 
impact  no  matter  who  is  doing  it—if  we  could  do  that  and  then 
that  might  inform  the  Committee  too  of  what  we  are  doing  and 
where gaps may be and if you should step forward with some addi-
tional legislation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Do  you  think  competition  could  push, 
though,  some  of  your  fellow  competitors  not  to  keep  up  with  those 
regulations? 

Mr. TAUKE. Competition works both ways on this issue, Senator. 
I mean, I think what we have found in our history on some of these 
issues is being on the side of the consumer and privacy is not a bad 
deal.  We  have  had  some  fairly  highly  publicized  lawsuits  over  the 
last  few  years  trying  to  protect  our  consumers’  privacy,  and  we 
think that benefited us in the marketplace. 

When  we  have  dealt  with  issues  like—I  remember  a  couple  dec-
ades  ago  now,  I  guess,  when  we  were  dealing  with  caller  ID.  In 
other  words,  there  were  a  lot  of  fits  and  starts  with  caller  ID.  Ini-
tially  it  was  thought  to  be  a  great  privacy  protector  because  you 
could  see  who  is  calling  you.  Then,  of  course,  there  was  concern 
that,  oh,  now  the  estranged  husband  knows  something  about  who 
is calling the wife and various other things that happened. And so 
there  was  concern  from  a  domestic  violence  perspective  and  so  on. 
Then we had blocking that came into play and various other things 
happened with the technology. 

So  we  evolved  to  the  place  today  I  think  where  most  consumers 
really  like  the  technology,  the  information  it  provides.  They  know 
how  to  protect  themselves  if  they  do  not  want  their  number  fol-
lowing their call. 

So I think it is the same thing here. We have to, over time, figure 

out how to do this the right way. 

But  I  think  it  is  in  our  company’s  interest  to  be  on  the  side  of 
privacy. I think that is a marketing advantage. I think that for the 
industry  as  a  whole,  it  is  essential  that  we  get  there.  The  worst 
thing for our industry is the consumers are afraid to use the Inter-
net. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And I would agree with you, especially from 
larger,  mainstream  companies  that  do  not  want  to  be  tarred  with 
having  not  protected  privacy  rights.  But  not  all  the  companies  in 
the  game  might  care  about  that  as  much.  And  that  is  why  I  am 
looking  at  some  rules  that  could  maybe  protect  your  own  industry 
if you had some rules that you already believe are in your best in-
terest  that  could  protect  the  consumers  from  other  companies 
which  might  not  share  your  interests  in  protecting  privacy  as  a 
marketing and as a good thing to do as a company. 

Ms.  ATTWOOD.  Yes.  I  would  like  to  underscore  that  because  not 
all  folks  in  this  space  have  consumers  that  they  answer  to.  We 
fully agree with Verizon’s position about this being a marketing ad-
vantage.  AT&T  views  that  absolutely  as  a  great  opportunity  here. 
But  right  now  there  is  behavioral  targeting  in  the  online  environ-
ment,  and  it  is  by  web  actors  who  do  not  have  direct  customers  to 
answer to. 

The  beauty  of  an  advertising-supported  model  is  that  it  is  free. 
The  disadvantage  is  that  your  customer  is  your  advertising  indus-
try.  It  is  not  retail.  It  is  not  our  customers.  So  while  I  think  that 
there is a direct advantage that we have to our customers, I think 
we would, at AT&T, say another key element to any legislative pro-
posal would be that it apply to all actors because that is really the 
only  way.  I  mean,  we  talk  a  lot  about  from  a  competitive  point  of 
view, and clearly that is of interest to AT&T. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

But  I  would  say  from  a  customer  confusion  question,  without 
really  addressing  this  issue  holistically,  when  the  customer  turns 
on  the  computer  and  goes  to  a  web  page  and  on  that  web  page 
there is advertising and on that advertising, that customer has in-
dicated  to  AT&T  that  they  do  not  want  to  be  tracked,  I  cannot  do 
anything to protect that customer from being tracked by other enti-
ties that are, in fact, appearing in that advertising space. 

So until we address this holistically, even efforts from companies 
such  as  ours  suggesting  that  there  ought  to  be  control  and  ought 
to  be  affirmative  selection  by  the  customer  cannot  be  implemented 
fully, and the customer can be confused. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
Senator  DORGAN.  We  had  other  companies  testifying  at  the  first 
hearing, and at that point we did not have the Internet service pro-
viders,  which  is  why  we  wanted  to  have  Internet  service  providers 
at this hearing. I understand the point you are making. 

Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
And  that  was  an  interesting  hearing,  and  this  is  an  issue  that 
is  getting  a  lot  of  attention,  as  you  would  expect.  And  I  do  not 
think  there  is  any  question  that  online  advertising  is  the  fuel  for 
this  economic  engine  that  is  really  driving  the  world  right  now.  It 
has resulted in substantial access to free content for people on the 
worldwide Web. 

But I do want to pick up on the previous discussion here because 
I  think,  Mr.  Tauke,  you  had  mentioned  in  your  remarks  that  the 
industry is working to develop self-regulating privacy standards for 
online advertising. And to get back to Ms. Attwood’s point, one en-
tity cannot do this. There has got to be some sort of an agreement, 
I think, within the industry. 

So I guess my question is, what is the time line for those stand-
ards? Who is participating in developing those standards? What are 
those  standards  going  to  look  like?  And  will  you  keep  us  updated 
as you progress down that road? 

Mr.  TAUKE.  First,  we  have  signed  some  nondisclosure  agree-
ments  with  some  other  companies  that  would  not  permit  me  to 
today publicly disclose who all the players are. But I think it is fair 
to say that there are ISPs, there are representatives of other online 
types  of  activities.  So  I  think  we  are  seeing  people  from  all  parts 
of  the  online  sector,  the  search  engines,  the  browsers,  and  so  on, 
who are interested in participating in this kind of thing. 

We also have talked to and engaged with some in the advertising 

industry who also have an interest. 

I  cannot  tell  you  we  will  get  there,  but  I  am  encouraged  by  the 
progress  so  far.  And  I  think  it  is  feasible  that  in  over  a  matter  of 
a few months we would be able to get a pretty strong group of play-
ers in the industry to move forward with best practices. 

Then the question becomes how do you enforce those. First, there 
is  a  lot  to  be  said  for  shining  the  light  of  day  on  a  lot  of  practices, 
and  if  industry  is  focused  on  doing  that,  it  is  able  to  do  that,  and 
force change. That happened with this Committee. This Committee 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

held  a  hearing,  and  as  the  witnesses  have  pointed  out,  people 
stopped their behavior because the light of day was shined upon it. 
That is what an industry group can do. 

Second,  as  we  have  alluded  to  earlier,  the  Federal  Trade  Com-
mission  also  has  jurisdiction  in  this  area,  has  indicated  it  intends 
to  assert  jurisdiction,  and  if  informed  by  good  industry  practices 
and standards, then I think the FTC would have greater ability to 
act appropriately. 

Senator  THUNE.  Do  you  have  a  time  line  for  when  all  this 

might—— 

Mr. TAUKE. What I would like to say to you is it will all happen 
in  2  months.  I  do  not  know  that  I  can  say  that.  I  think  this  is  a 
process.  You  are  familiar  with  that,  of  course,  in  the  Senate.  It  is 
a process. I think we have made good progress. I think as you have 
heard  this  morning,  several  companies  are  endorsing  very  similar 
principles  here.  So  I  think  that  there  is  a  consensus  developing. 
And  I  hope  by  the  end  of  the  year,  certainly  by  the  time  you  come 
back,  that  we  can  report  back  to  you  and  give  you  progress  on 
where  we  are.  I  think  we  will  have  something  fairly  good  to  say. 
Senator  THUNE.  That  would  be  really  helpful  because  I  think 
that  that  is  a  preferable  solution  to  having  us  try  and  legislate 
something in this area. But it has to be at least, I think, somewhat 
comprehensive in terms of the scope of those from industry who are 
participating  in  order  to  make  it  effective.  So  I  would  encourage 
you as you continue down that track. 

And I would direct this, I guess, to any of our panelists. But you 
talk  about  sensitive  information  deserving  a  greater  degree  of  pro-
tection  than  regular  online  uses.  And  I  guess  the  question  would 
be,  what  is  considered  sensitive  personal  information?  Is  that  a 
health record? Is that a credit card history, e-mails? What qualifies 
in your judgment in that category of sensitive information? 

Mr. STERN. Senator, all of those could count as sensitive informa-
tion.  Certainly  medical  information  is  sensitive.  And  we  believe 
that this opt-in framework ensures that we will protect those forms 
of sensitive information. 

We  also  think  that  there  are  certain  types  of  information—and 
medical  information  may  be  one  of  those—that  merits  a  dialogue 
between  policymakers  and  participants  in  industry  that  would  put 
even  more  stringent  controls  around  certain  types  of  information, 
including  making  it  possibly  entirely  off  limits  for  activities  like 
targeted online advertising. 

Ms.  SOHN.  I  think  it  is  critical  that  it  is  the  Internet  user  who 
makes  that  choice  as  to  what  is  sensitive.  Right  now  with  deep 
packet inspection, sometimes it is a third party or the NebuAd that 
is deciding what is sensitive and not. As you point out, there is not 
a  commonly  understood  definition  of  what  sensitive  is.  So  that  is, 
to  me,  a  critical  part  of  putting  control  back  in  the  Internet  users’ 
hands.  They  decide  what  is  sensitive  as  opposed  to  a  third  party 
with whom they are not even contracting. 

Mr.  TAUKE.  Let  me  just  say  first  this  is  a  tough  area.  It  is  hard 
to  define  exactly  what  the  sensitive  information  is  and  precisely 
how you handle it. 

So, for example, we all agree, I think, that medical records would 
be sensitive information. Yet, I get my prescriptions online. I do not 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

know  about  the  rest  of  you.  And  I  want  my  online  pharmacist  to 
keep track of what I have. I am happy when they send me a notice 
saying,  you  know,  it  is  time  to  renew  your  prescription.  If  I  would 
get  another  prescription  that  interacted  inappropriately  with  what 
I  have  today,  I  would  hope  that  they  would  notify  me  and  tell  me 
that. So that means we are asking them, on the one hand, to keep 
track  of  some  of  these  things.  On  the  other  hand,  this  is  certainly 
information that most of us would say should not be tracked. 

So there are some fine lines here to draw. It is tough, but I think 
that  this  is  part  of  what  we  hope  we  can  make  progress  on  in  an 
industry process. 

Ms.  ATTWOOD.  I  would  also  underscore  what  Gigi  said,  which  is 
absolutely  creating  tools  to  enable  our  users  to  be  able  to  individ-
ually  assess  what  is  sensitive  will  be  a  critical  thing,  again,  an-
other  potentially  wonderful  advance  that  we  could  use  the  tech-
nology  to  actually  empower  the  customer  to  orient  themselves 
around what is sensitive. 

The  last  thing  that  the  provider  wants  to  do  is  make  that  judg-
ment.  I  can  tell  you  whether  Government  makes  it  or  the  user 
makes  it,  the  last  thing  that  we  want  to  do  is  try  to  make  some 
judgment  as  to  what  is  important  to  our  customers  when  it  comes 
to sensitive information. 

Senator  THUNE.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  one  more  question.  My 

time is expired. 

Senator DORGAN. Why don’t you proceed? 
Senator  THUNE.  OK.  I  would  like  to  have  you  describe—Mr. 
Stern, you mentioned the difference between relevant online adver-
tising  and  targeted  online  advertising.  Could  you  elaborate  on  the 
difference between those two, and from your perspective, are those 
different  types  of  targeted  online  advertising  that  are  more  prob-
lematic for consumer privacy? 

Mr.  STERN.  Ads  can  be  relevant  for  a  number  of  reasons,  Sen-
ator. For example, when customers come to a Website and they go 
to  the  sports  page  of  that  Website  and  then  they  see  advertise-
ments  for  team  memorabilia,  that  context  was  used  in  order  to 
make  the  ad  relevant.  However,  if  the  relevance  is  based  on  the 
customer’s  behavior  on  other  unrelated  Websites,  then  we  would 
consider  that  targeted  online  advertising,  the  type  of  advertising 
that  should  be  governed  under  the  four  principles  that  we  talked 
about  earlier,  informed  consent,  plus  safeguarding  consumer  pri-
vacy, and value. 

Senator  THUNE.  Thanks,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you  all  very 

much for your testimony. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator Wicker? 

STATEMENT OF HON. ROGER F. WICKER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator  WICKER.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Dorgan,  for  having  this 

follow up hearing. 

You  know,  I  was  sitting  here  thinking  John  Thune  came  to  the 
House of Representatives in 1996. I got here in 1994. We were talk-
ing  about  this  thing  called  the  worldwide  Web.  If  we  had  a  little 
time  during  the  orientation,  we  could  go  to  a  room  and  surf  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

worldwide Web. And to think how far this industry has come in 12 
or 14 short years is just breathtaking. 

I  pay  my  bills.  I  check  my  balance.  I  make  purchases.  And  it  is 
the  engine  that  is  largely  driving  the  international  economy,  and 
we  want  to  be  able  to  facilitate  that  for  the  economy  and  for  job 
creation and for consumers’ convenience. 

So I appreciate the fact that there seems to be a feeling that the 
Congress  should  defer  perhaps  and  see  if  these  issues  of  privacy 
and  behavioral  advertising  can  be  worked  out  among  the  partici-
pants rather than as a result of legislation. 

I  will  begin  with  Mr.  Tauke.  Maybe  within  2  months,  we  might 
have an agreement announced among the providers. How will they 
compare  to  the  proposed  behavioral  advertising  guidelines  of  the 
FTC? 

Mr. TAUKE. I think all of the companies that are engaged in dis-
cussion  on  this  issue  are  well  aware  of  the  FTC’s  principles.  And 
of  course,  you  never  know  the  outcome  of  a  discussion  until  it  is 
completed. But I think what the FTC laid out has been very helpful 
and  informative,  and  in  turn,  we  would  hope  what  the  industry 
could  come  up  with  would  also  be  helpful  and  informative  to  the 
FTC. 

Senator WICKER. OK. Other panelists? 
Mr.  STERN.  Senator,  we  think  the  principles  that  we  have  pro-
posed  are  very  similar  to  what  was  laid  out  by  the  FTC,  but  they 
actually  go  one  step  further  in  protecting  consumer  privacy.  And 
that  is  that  we  are  seeking  affirmative  customer  consent  for  the 
use  of  any  type  of  information  for  the  purposes  of  targeted  online 
advertising, not just personally identifiable information. 

Senator WICKER. And would you explain what you mean by that 

to a layman? 

Mr.  STERN.  Absolutely.  When  you  held  your  testimony  in  July 
and met with NebuAd, they talked about the ability that they had 
with  their  technology  to  anonymize  the  data  that  they  received  so 
that  they  would  track  the  customer’s  behavior,  but  it  could  not  be 
attributed  to  any  individual.  It  would  be  used  to  deliver  relevant 
ads  to  that  individual  while  they  browsed,  but  they  could  not  tie 
it back to a person. They could not tell that that browsing behavior 
was  your  browsing  behavior,  although  they  could  change  your 
browsing experience based on the information. 

What  we  are  proposing  is  that  we  would  not  even  do  what 
NebuAd  talked  about,  absent  affirmative  customer  consent.  In 
other words, we would not use your information whether or not we 
could attribute it to you personally to deliver targeted online adver-
tising to you. 

Senator WICKER. I see. 
Other members of the panel? 
Ms. ATTWOOD. Well, I would just say I think that the FTC proc-
ess  has  greatly  informed  our  industry  discussions.  They  were  able 
to,  along  with  great  work  that  has  been  done  in  the  privacy  con-
sumer  community  by  Ms.  Sohn’s  group,  by  CDT,  others  that  have 
helped  shed  light  on  the  issue,  helped  identify  the  practices  that 
are  most  concerning  to  consumers,  and  have  through  the  impri-
matur  of  the  FTC  and  its  process  created  importance,  as  has  this 
Committee, creating the incentive for the industry to come together 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

to  talk,  to  make  sure  that  we  understand  how  we  can,  in  fact, 
achieve  ultimately  a  greater  sense  of  privacy  assurance  for  con-
sumers  so  that  they  use  our  services  and  use  the  Internet  even 
more.  I  think  that  there  is  no  question  that  the  FTC  process  has 
been quite involved in the development of that. 

Ms.  SOHN.  Can  I  be  the  skunk  at  the  self-regulatory  party?  Be-

cause—— 

Senator WICKER. That would be a lot of fun. 
Ms. SOHN. I want to make two points. 
Number one is to address something that Senator Klobuchar said 
about  competition.  The  problem  is  that,  at  least  in  broadband, 
there is not that much competition. This is something my organiza-
tion  has  talked  about  for  a  long,  long  time.  And  a  lot  of  the  ISPs 
that were using deep packet inspection and NebuAd were not sub-
ject to great competition. A lot of them were rural ISPs. So the no-
tion  that  there  is  going  to  be  this  competitive  pressure,  I’m  dubi-
ous. 

The  second  thing—and  this  is  the  point  that  I  discussed  in  my 
oral  testimony  but  discuss  in  more  detail  in  my  written  testi-
mony—is  that  the  Communications  Act  already  does  cover  some 
ISPs.  There  is  a  lot  of  talk  about  a  level  playing  field,  but  right 
now  cable  Internet  services  are  covered  by  stricter  privacy  regula-
tion  than  broadband  telephone  information  ISP  services.  So  there 
is  already  in  the  law  gaps  where  Mr.  Tauke’s  company  is  being 
treated  differently  than  a  Comcast.  So  I  do  think  that  at  a  min-
imum you need to amend the Communications Act to fix those gaps 
because  right  now  you  do  not  have  a  level  playing  field  between 
broadband ISPs. 

Senator WICKER. Response? 
Mr.  TAUKE.  Part  of  that  highlights  the  point.  Yes,  there  are  all 
kinds  of  rules  that  apply  to  all  different  companies  differently.  If 
you guys could take on the Communications Act and level the play-
ing  field,  most  of  us  would  applaud  heartily.  But  rewriting  that 
act—it has been a long process and it is very hard to get anything 
to fruition when you take on that major a task. 

So  we  are  not  saying  that  we  are  opposed  to  the  Committee  ad-
dressing the issue, but what you are doing here, having a hearing, 
forcing  industry  to  address  the  issue  is  helpful.  We  have  the  FTC 
that has some authority already. We have an industry that I think 
wants  to  get  its  act  together.  It  is  in  our  own  interest  to  clean  up 
the act. Right? So I think that can help. 

If all that should happen, if the Senate—God bless you if you go 
forward  and  do  your  thing.  That  is  terrific.  But  in  the  meanwhile, 
I  think  there  is  a  need  for  this  other  activity  to  go  on.  That  will 
inform  what  you  do.  It  may  turn  out  this  is  not  such  a  big  issue, 
or it may turn out there are other problems that arise as this goes 
on.  But  we  ought  to  go  forward  with  the  self-regulatory  approach, 
try  to  use  what  is  there,  and  that  will  help  inform  you,  I  think, 
what the challenges are and where we may need additional legisla-
tion. 

Senator WICKER. Thank you. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator Wicker, thank you. 
This  issue  of  self-regulation—I  think  the  process  that  is  ongoing 
is very valuable. But in the ultimate, self-regulation works if there 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

is,  number  one,  adequate  criteria  established,  and  number  two,  if 
it is enforceable. And one of my concerns is that what is happening 
now  and  what  will  happen  in  the  future  with  respect  to  Internet 
advertising  is  various  entities,  content  providers,  Internet  service 
providers, and others, have information that is going to become in-
creasingly  valuable,  and  it  is  tempting  product  to  sell  to  someone 
who  would  like  to  purchase  it.  And  so  the  question  is  under  what 
conditions does that happen. 

I want to come back to this question. Mr. Stern, you talked about 
when  NebuAd  appeared  before 
the 
anonymizing  of  information.  It  seems  to  me,  however,  that  if 
NebuAd gathers all of this information and develops the strategies 
for  targeted  advertising  and  profiling,  that  if  they  are  able  to  de-
liver  that  advertisement  back  to  the  Internet  address,  it  is  really 
not anonymous, is it? 

this  Committee  and 

Mr.  STERN.  Senator,  there  is  a  separation  between  the  informa-
tion that NebuAd has, which is a profile attached to an anonymous 
identifier,  and  the  information  that  the  ISP  has,  which  is  the  con-
nection  between  that  anonymous  identifier  and  the  individual.  As 
a consequence, there is—and I am not an expert on NebuAd’s tech-
nology,  given  that  we  have  not  engaged  in  targeted  online  adver-
tising  and  we  have  not  done  any  sort  of  a  deal  with  NebuAd  or 
anyone like that—but there is, in fact, a set of technologies that are 
used  in  that  approach  to  protect  the  customer’s  identity  and  ano-
nymity. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  there  has  to  be  a  string  somewhere  from 
the  information  gathered  and  then  ultimately  delivered  to  the 
Internet  address  of  the  person  whose  tendencies  on  the  Internet 
have been profiled. I mean, this reminds me of the discussion I sat 
in  last  night  for  2  hours  on  the  financial  rescue  issue,  the  discus-
sion  about  firewalls  that  exist.  It  turns  out  the  firewalls  were  not 
so fireproof. 

Mr.  STERN.  That  is  correct,  Senator.  There  is  no  perfect  tech-

nology here. 

But the principles that we have outlined ensure that targeted on-
line  advertising  would  only  take  place  if  consumers  affirmatively 
consent after being informed of how their information will be used. 
As  a  consequence,  we  think  that  the  harm  that  you  have  raised  is 
one  that  customers  will  be  able  to  evaluate  and  weigh  against  the 
benefits that they will enjoy by being able to see more relevant ads. 
Senator  DORGAN.  It  is  interesting.  I  was  just  looking  at  a  report 
that  was  released  this  morning.  The  information  was  provided  me 
last  evening  of  what  was  to  be  released  this  morning.  It  is  a  poll 
released  today  by  Consumer  Reports’  National  Research  Center, 
and  it  has  a  lot  of  interesting  information  in  it.  There  is  a  lot  of 
misinformation  out  there  and  a  great  deal  of  lack  of  information. 
Consumers  are  aware  that  information  about  their  surfing  hab-
its,  that  is,  movements  on  the  Web,  is  being  collected  online.  And 
here is what they believe. 

Sixty-one  percent  of  consumers  are  confident  that  what  they  do 
online  is  private  and  not  shared  without  their  permission.  That  is 
what people now believe. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

Fifty-seven  percent  believe  that  companies  must  identify  them-
selves  and  indicate  why  they  are  collecting  data  and  whether  they 
intend to share it with other organizations. 

Forty-eight percent believe that their consent is now required for 
companies  to  use  personal  information  they  collect  from  online  ac-
tivities. 

Forty-three percent believe a court order is now required to mon-

itor activities online. 

I  only  describe  that  to  you  because  this  is  just  released  this 
morning.  What  it  does  show  is  while  people,  I  think  almost  all  of 
us  would  understand,  are  very  concerned  about  privacy,  they  have 
very little understanding about what exists or what might not exist 
to create fences or gates or protections for their online privacy. 

I think that the work that our colleagues in the House have done 
with  their  data  gathering  and  hearings,  the  work  that  we  have 
done,  and  the  work  that  the  FTC  is  now  doing  and  the  efforts  by 
people in your industry to come together and develop approaches— 
again,  I  think  in  many  ways  these  hearings  kind  of  provoke  and 
require  people  to  be  thinking  what  are  we  doing  and  how  does  it 
relate to what our responsibilities are and what the law is. I think 
all  of  this  is  constructive  for  us,  as  we  move  down  the  road  here, 
to understand what is necessary. Is this something that can be self- 
regulated  with  enforcement  capabilities,  or  will  there  need  to  be, 
both  at  the  FTC  and  also  will  there  need  to  be  here  in  the  Con-
gress,  some  legislative  guidelines  developed  that  will  inform  us  as 
we move forward. 

I  do  not  think  any  of  us  fully  know  the  answer  to  that,  but  we 
are  now  learning  a  great  deal  more  than  we  knew,  which  I  think 
is progress. 

I  want  to  thank  the  three  Internet  service  providers  for  making 
themselves  available  for  this  hearing.  Your  testimony,  I  think,  is 
instructive for us. 

Ms.  Sohn,  the  title  of  your  organization  is  Public  Knowledge, 
which is pretty all-encompassing I was thinking, as I read that last 
evening.  So  we  thank  you  for  providing  public  knowledge  about 
these issues from your perspective, which I think is also very valu-
able to this Committee. 

This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:10 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
For the American people, privacy is a treasured right, but it is also a right under 
regular  attack.  In  this  digital  age,  commercial  forces  can  amass  treasure  troves  of 
data about each and every one of us. This is especially true when it comes to where 
we go and what we do on the Internet. 

Today we focus on the on-ramps to the Internet, and explore in greater depth the 
consumer privacy policies of our Nation’s largest broadband providers. We will con-
sider the abilities these providers have to view our online behavior and discuss what 
notice they should provide to consumers when they seek to do so. Further, we must 
examine  whether  our  communications  laws  governing  consumer  privacy  have  kept 
up with rapidly changing technology or require adjustment. 

I look forward to hearing from our witnesses. 

Æ 

(37) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:55 Apr 06, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\48450.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

